There is considerable interest in the idea that “blogs” are somehow able to offset the mainstream media’s (MSM) ability to sell a given narrative to the public, a power which is of considerable interest in peace and even more so in war. It is widely recognized that molding public perceptions through narratives is nearly as important in war as the outcomes on the actual battlefield. Palestinian Media Watch convincingly demonstrates that Arab and Muslim organizations have long made influencing international publics through print and broadcast media a strategic goal, especially in any confrontation with Israel. This effort has historically followed two tracks: the establishment of technically sophisticated media outlets like al-Jazeera to sell messages directly to audiences; and mounting information operations aimed at shaping the way in which Western Media outlets cover any issue of interest.
However, I do worry that my blog will become very boring if I don’t find something better to write than my thoughts at the moment.
How can we re-frame that statement using words that are positive and nonjudgmental?
25. “Nothing diminishes anxiety faster than action.” -Walter Anderson
Re-visit: Yes
There’s definitely room for the Neal Stephensons of the world. There is no universal “right” way to do things. A long sentence is not necessarily a bad one. But as you write, you should be aware of how approachable your writing is. Remember that someone has to read this. They have to want to read it. Draw them in with strong words and a stronger story. Don’t weigh them down. If you’re going to use a lot of words, use the right ones.
As Bubba noted, God didn’t “give them over” to square dancing or some benign thing, He gave them over to homosexual behavior.
John 3:36 “Whoever believes in the Son has eternal life, but whoever rejects the Son will not see life, for God’s wrath remains on him.”
- lobster chili blanc with Harvest Ale - seasonal fresh hop pale ale
Stop! Stay perfectly still
Nothin's worryin' me!"
Ink - Memento Black, Copics, PTI Raspberry Fizz
We sat there, on that bench, and talked about that social behavior for a while. Me asking questions, and trying to understand. And her trying to explain. And that’s when she finally realized that I could ask the questions I asked because I really didn’t understand. “I know it’s a lie. What they say to me. The way everyone pretends that everything is OK. But it helps me, I think. To have people around me that behave as if nothing’s wrong. As if nothing’s different.”
“Yeah, I’ll take that,” he said.
Many courageous (or foolhardy) travelers seek out hair-raising bridges just for the thrill. The bridges along the route to Colombia’s National Archaeological Park of Tierradentro are a good example. Though there are safer routes via bus from La Plata, some thrill-seekers choose to ride motorcycles over slippery bamboo crossings deep in the mountains, where one wrong move could mean plunging into a turbulent river.
Heck, what am I not in love with???
Developed in partnership between both agencies, this curriculum is the latest offering in the FDIC’s award-winning Money Smart program.
As many Vamp readers know, the red office/dining room shown in the book is gone, and the Gris Gris (Voodoo) altar packed up and stored in a safe place. That altar was a direct out pouring after Hurricane Katrina, and when I decided to change the red room and put the altar away, it was symbolic of finally healing and moving on from the whole emotional journey that Katrina dealt. The altar is still there, packed in boxes, stored in a cupboard, and the power and protection it bestowed on our home and our psyches still emanates its good energy.
The cover star of the twenty-first edition of YHO was Sylvia Tella, and the photo was borrowed from the sleeve of Spell, her debut LP. This issue began with a quote from Arsene Wenger and continued: “I like the state of ‘not knowing’. It can be a springboard to discovery, which helps pieces of information fit together in enlightening ways. It can also be a source of worry, with pieces of a jigsaw turning up unexpectedly to befuddle and bemuse.”
The former Yakatori House will become Katsura Grill (but the menu will stay basically the same style), and the area on the hill will be made brighter and redone as the Katsura Gardens… not for sure, but the area just past (to the left of) the new Kabuki Cafe may also be redone and allow wheelchair access to the area.
I offer this as evidence of my own potential insanity. DOOMSDAY is Neil Marshall’s third film and it is not well-loved by critics or the public. Over at Rotten Tomatoes, DOOMSDAY has a 50% rating with critics and a 46% rating from the public. In contrast, I kinda love it. While not the greatest movie ever made, DOOMSDAY has plenty to appease me: Rhona Mitra in a post-apocalyptic setting fighting refugees from both Mad Max and King Arthur, plenty of stylistic violence, and a pretty decent car chase featuring a Bentley Continental GT jumping through a bus.
M- "Really?"
The painter once said that he had something in common with Walt Disney and Norman Rockwell: He wanted to make people happy.
The winners will be drawn from the designer’s blogs, so be sure to visit them
Later today, I'll post my last Ralph McQuarrie animated Star Wars cover with The Empire Strikes Back The Illustrated Edition.
A couple of months ago a bunch of my friends starting using this site. I was sent an invite and decided to log on see what all the hype was about. This was my thought process once I first got logged on:
kennel up (go to her crate)
Good morning everyone. Today I'd like to share a project with you that I put together yesterday. One of my blogging buddies Ana at Scrappy Pink Corner made these gorgeous bird houses which inspired me to create one as well.
A totally quirky read! I kept saying to myself how strange the story was and how I didn't have any idea what was going on, but it didn't matter. I wanted to keep reading and reading and I was determined to figure out what was truly happening in Little Hope.
Friday Dessert Aces
In 1992, Tanaka received a singing award at the sixth Japan Beautiful Girl Contest, which formed the start of her career in show business. Notables also taking awards that year were Aiko Sato (Grand Prix) and Ryoko Yonekura (Jury Prize).
Responsible for ensuring availability and performance of the databases that support the system
Contestant: France.
Shown is 2 coats topped with a coat of NYC Grand Central Station.
He dives below the surf, casts free his past,
Finally I did revisit Kilve, Somerset. It is so beautiful here. No accidents this time ~ I managed to stay on my feet! The next and last photo is of the beach ~ you can see the interesting rock formations on the beach:
I was working with a team around a customer service project yesterday when one of them said, rather petulantly, ‘but we did this three years ago, why hasn’t it worked?’ Well, the only answer to this was that perhaps ‘it’ did work, but it worked three years ago. Rather like keeping Herman on the road, you don’t just fix him once and he goes forever, but rather he runs until the next thing starts squeaking or falls off, until the next intervention is required. That organisation probably did solve it’s customer service challenge three years ago, but the world has changed: the challenge they face is how to learn from their heritage, the tribal knowledge that sits within the organisation, but how also to update and retell that story in a way that’s relevant today.
Google tried to make it more interactive, that’s now you will be able to see profile pics of your contacts in conversation to track to whom you communicate ‘what’.
walk to West End at 79th
Your mind-set, how and what you think about consistently.
"In the Q'uaballah there are twenty angels emanating out of the right and left hand of god. They are the Sefiroth. Sefira is the singular of this word, and an Averse Sefira would be one such of the unholy. We have taken these angels and extrapolated them as narrative vehicles for our tales of mythic irony." Duh.
16E. BELGIAN SPECIALTY ALE
My mistress’ eyes are nothing like the sun;
Neutra RR, Swan SH, Hertz-Piciotto I, Windham GC, Wrensch M, Shaw GM, et al. Potential sources of bias and confounding in environmental epidemiologic studies of pregnancy outcome. Epidemiology 1992; 3: 134-142.
1/2 C blueberries or other seasonal berries
I will add new photos often and also take requests via my email here to add any photo of your choice that you'd like to add into the shop that might not be currently there!
I will still do it all
For sides I had Frieda’s Organic Traditional Polenta. I sliced the polenta thinly into 1/4-inch-thick slices. Placed on a lightly oiled baking sheet. Brushed the polenta with a 1/2 tablespoon of the oil. Baked them at 350 degrees for 10 minutes. I left the info and web site link for Frieda’s Below. I also had boiled Mini Carrots and Healthy Life Whole Grain Bread. For dessert later a Yoplait Chocolate Eclair Parfait.
But any thought that China might concede some ground on the Peace Prize in pursuit of their Nobel dreams in science has received a rude shock in the last few days. Last week, Norway’s foreign minister, Jonas Gahr Støre wrote some conciliatory words in a full-page commentary in Norway’s leading business newspaper Dagens Næringsliv, saying that the Norwegian government has taken China’s angry reaction seriously, understands that they are upset, but hopes that moves can be made to restore relations. This olive branch offering was rejected by China yesterday; a statement from the Chinese embassy in Oslo saying that the Norwegian government “supported this wrong decision”, and that “we expect that the Norwegian side will make tangible efforts to restore and develop the bilateral relations.”
Such an unexpected display of concern for the feelings of a potential spouse would almost make one believe that Nietzsche’s aloofness towards the opposite sex stems not from disdain, but from a strange sense of responsibility in not wanting to torment any woman with the eccentricities of his person. Unfortunately, the rest of this very same letter makes such a claim nearly impossible to defend:
But first, I’ve got to plan for tonight! Another great night with great friends! It’s Sushi making time for me!
Lanosterols – See Lanolin.
Now of course my logical and rational brain wants to say it was just a coincidence...haven't we all had that "if I had left ten minutes earlier" feeling when we see an accident? But when I think about Katie's dream, and her unusual behavior in the morning, I can't help wondering... Maybe there was more to her dream than what she told me about last night. Maybe somewhere deep in her subconscious, she remembered something else from her dream that made her act out that way.
Today, I found the manufacturer's datasheet for the battery. DrJim, Quizikle and the other engineers who drop by here will probably understand how I almost let out an audible squee when I found it. According to the datasheet, a constant current discharge at 10.4A (naturally not on the datasheet) can be interpolated to be around 2 1/2 - 3 hours (probably not as much as 3). It didn't make it, but I haven't been very nice to this battery and have almost thrown it out before. Often, old lead-acid batteries can be revived by charge cycles. We'll see.
Phreak: I made it myself using tin foil.
Dr. Ken Romeo is a Board-Certified Physician in Alternative Medicine, a scientist and a nutrition expert who teaches how to improve brain health, memory, physical fitness and age reversal through lifestyle modification and Nutraceutical supplementation in The Romeo OptiLIFE Health Program™. Dr. Romeo has been studying, writing and “speaking out” about the effects of lifestyle on disease for over 10 years.
melted chocolate and sprinkles (for decorating)
It is a long dress consisting of two parts—-a top part and a bottom part. The top part is a tight tunic with long sleeves and a high collar. Moreover, the top part includes two panels which float loosely down the front and the back. The bottom part is composed of loose pants which reach the ankles. Originally, Ao Dai is made of silk and the style has not changed a lot in the previous decades. However, modern Vietnamese designers are trying to use new materials, decorations and adornments.
Although I am really counting on that extra day in february to have a big contribution to my productivity...
Here’s to yesteryear!
Frankie's frail shoulders slumped. Tommy folded the newspaper and laid it on the table. They sat in silence for several moments; Frankie stared into his swirling steaming coffee, and Tommy tapped his finger pensively onto the table, his face tight as a drum.
With the government swiftly moving to block communities’ access to such legal recourse, there emerged a growing consensus amongst Sarawakian activists that their real hope rested in political change under the umbrella reformasi movement that was rapidly gaining strength in West Malaysia. This awareness was boosted by a flourishing new media network.
The show had something for everyone: fashion, photography and dance: Moffitt started out as a dancer, and struck many modern dance poses in her modeling. It was the ultimate mixed media presentation; the ground floor had “Basic Black” playing on one screen with a slide show playing Claxton photos of Moffitt decked out in Rudi’s stunning designs on the other. On the upper floor were original and replicas of Gernreich designs dressed up in mannequins around the room. Seeing his mod fashions in the flesh complimented the great Claxton fashion photography that framed the walls around the room.
I don’t introduce myself as Jaja. I often introduce myself as Jasmine or Ja. I like it when people I meet start with calling me Jasmine, then progress to Ja, then finally Jaja. It’s like a friendship indicator. Those people who call me Jaja are people who know me for a long time.
When the Lord revealed Himself to the chief persecutor, his attitude changed immediately. Acts 9:6 informs us that he trembled and was astonished. That is, he was amazed but that particular word is associated with terror, facing certain death. This was bad news indeed. He had nowhere to turn, especially being blind.
In his latest column for the New York Times Magazine, Adam Davidson cites Gal Luft, an oil expert who dismisses political proposals from the left and the right to lower the price of gas. We asked him to elaborate in the following post.
11:00am – Rugby Hawaii Union present, Youth Boys & Girls, High School, Men’s and Women’s matches
Embarrassed but not done, Ted stated matter-of-factly “Malcolm X.”
Keep your faith
In the Riverside section of town, for example, a 4,000-square-foot house on Long Island Sound closed this month for $10 million after being on the market for just two months, a third of the current average. The home, which has a separate studio and two acres of land, had been listed for $12.9 million, but Mr. Pruner said $10 million was a more realistic value.
6) Bake in preheated oven at 160C for about 50 to 55 minutes. Test with skewer (reduced time for cupcakes, about 35 to 40 minutes).
conversing on air and water
only the afternoons were ours
We had lots of gorgeous entries to last week’s “ribbons and buttons” challenge and the DT had a brilliant time visiting your blogs and seeing your amazing creations. It is a pleasure to see so many regular entrants to our challenges but equally fun to visit new crafters who have just discovered Letraset pens.
IN MY DEFENCE normally we would talk or hang out every day so I think I deserve a little lattitude for my freak out esp when combined with the vanishing act but yeah, in the cold light of day – we really just have me being a dunderhead.
It turned out so super gorgeous, I gifted it to my sister-in-law. I have no pics of that one. But I do have a custom order from her friend who saw her in it... ;D
The issue of regular public scrutiny is linked to the issue of select committees – which I pay particular interest in because the level of scrutiny can be forensic. (This is because rather than the ‘one question and then you’re out’ style of departmental questions in the Commons, MPs can follow through lines of questioning – which ‘hostile’ witnesses find incredibly uncomfortable, as Anthony Inglese of HMRC found to his cost. Part of me thinks that there is a role for the chief executives of executive agencies to appear either alongside ministers at monthly departmental questions, or at separate regularly scheduled ‘Westminster Hall’ debates that any MP can attend (rather than the current limited system of cross-examination only by those MPs on the select committee that has the remit of scrutinising that agency).
Mistletoe also figures prominently in the mythology of the Norsemen. Odin sired twin sons by his wife Frigg, Baldr and Hodr. Baldr was the most beautiful child ever born, mortal or divine, and Hod happened to be blind. Frigg doted on Baldr because of his beauty, but Frigg also had a problem. She had a bit of a Cassandra complex (see what I did there?) in that she was gifted with the ability to predict the future, but no one would believe her if she said or did anything about it.
Sid looked over to his right at Johnny, who had his back up against the window, staring him down. You could see his bottom set of teeth when his tongue wasn’t in the way.
I told him to remember this moment because when I show him a motorcycles that doesnt have a headlight on, he's going to say he never made that claim
Unfortunately, as I packed, I did not anticipate the small plane. I didn't know that I wouldn't be able to carry on my small rolling suitcase with me. I had packed that suitcase to function as diaper bag, purse, wheely beast overflow, coat bag, snack bag, activity bag, etc. It was a great plan, for the big plane. If I had known about not being able to take my carry on with me, I would have packed a carry-on within a carry-on. Here's what I would have put in it ::
Alice tells Fool about Mommy and Daddy and how they keep looking for the perfect child but all the bad boys did or said something wrong and had to have their tongues cut out and get locked away in the cellar. One boy Roach (Sean Whalen) has escaped the cellar and is living in the walls where Daddy can’t get him but no-one has got out of the house. This is the boy who tried to save Fool earlier but Fool ran away. Plenty of others have got in but none of them left and Alice shows Fool the dolls she has made to remember the victims that the Robesons fed to The people under the stairs. Daddy has put on a gimp suit (Seriously!) and is chasing round the house looking for Fool and Roach and firing his gun at the noises in the walls but Roach leads Fool to safety. When Fool goes back to get Alice to get her out of the house Daddy catches them. When Roach tries to get away Daddy shoots him.
O Infinitely Passionate Father,
Khirad: I only grovel before God. And aap ki aala zarfi ka shukriya...
Finally, I asked my angels (who are always with me and conatantly averting disaster) to gimme a hand with this one. It took a few days (I'm terribly impatient) but, OH MAN ! Did they ever deliver! The funny thing about it is when I ordered what arrived today I didn't even know the BSBP existed!! Talk about divine timing!
El hot dog $9
I decided with one week left that it wasn't the end of the world, after all I could warn other travelers by writing an honest review of our experience. But that was not the case, because regardless of the evidence in videos, texts and pictures we sent to Airbnb (by their request) it now seems like they have taken the hosts side and removed our negative review.
That leads me to only one conclusion. Some mother fucker robbed it. Or at least peeled it off and discarded it.
Please, please no more snow!
- PROTECTING THE GREENBELT: Tony Ball transformed a beautiful home into a bombsite filled with sewage and old scrap.
3 lbs ground chuck
Big jobs, little jobs - first jobs and worst jobs are on the menu for tonight's Radio Podrophenia, as Piley and I act as your career advisers and roll out occupational options such as Taxmen, Painters, Engineers and Sailors onto our Tuesday night playlist.
Janathon has reached it's end.
The answer is – there is no answer. If you care about provenance and genealogy, then you should try elsewhere, because I have nothing in your size.
Kimmi
By the way Dictionary.com defines kitsch as "something of tawdry design, appearance, or content created to appeal to popular or undiscriminating taste."
Optional add-ins:
so i stare out my window and wonder why i wasn't born independently wealthy or some sort of nonsense. because if i was, i would run off to paris, or tuscany, or timbuktu...or someplace really exotic, like...the moon. and then i wouldn't have to deal with idiots...or...the idiots would be so different and intriguing that i wouldn't notice they were idiots. and i wouldn't have to tell people that have worked hard and through no fault of their own, their contract is severed because some idiot didn't research law very well and i hired them thinking it was cool...but it wasn't really cool and now ...i have to end the contract and figure out how to pay them.
I think the people in Jerantut are wise enough to know. I don’t want them to vote me because I’m the sultan’s brother, I want them to vote me for what I’ve done. I told them, if you want me I’m around, if not, I’m out. I think the people of Jerantut should look at that. Vote for a wakil rakyat who performs.
I’m curious too, I’m curious about this heart
* I don’t normally to inserts like this before my stories, but per popular demand I will be starting a story-line that will be ongoing until whatever time I see fit to kill it. With that said, I will now release you into the story. Keep in mind this will progress, it’s just the beginning of a much longer series.*
A detailed report on the Balochistan situation was presented before the committee, however, the committee members expressed complete dissatisfaction with it.
The vrijmarkt was huuge and seemed never-ending. A whole big area of town was sectioned off for it and as we walked around it we realised we now had no idea where we were. Unfortunately I didn’t take my camera for this part so excuse the lack of photos. I really enjoyed looking round though. In the end we didn’t buy anything, just some doughnuts from a stall. I saw some pokemon DVDs and books that I encouraged Myrte to buy but they were in Dutch so it wouldn’t have been fun to watch them. I was also on the look out for Miffy, my favourite cartoon character who happens to be from Utrecht. I spotted her on a blanket and picked her up. Myrte told me to buy it but then the owner said something “Oh you can have it for free”, “Seriously?!”. I was not going to turn that offer down and I feel it was a very good purchase, even though she may be naked, but I think it’s supposed to be like that.
Better slap down those who threaten the safety of our comfortable boundaries, right?
I am not writing about the techniques used in Healing as such, one can find it all on Google or write to Dr. Padmini directly to know all about it.
Winner: Magic Rock/Dark Star - Rock Star
I imagine leaning over and apologetically reminding
Why do as others do?
Gabon's "natural nuclear fission reactors," according to Wikipedia, "are the only known sites in which natural nuclear reactors existed. Other rich uranium ore bodies would also have had sufficient uranium to support nuclear reactions at that time, but the combination of uranium, water and physical conditions needed to support the chain reaction was unique to the Oklo ore bodies."
As a parent of two children, managing a household with one income (I’m fortunate that my husband works), I usually don’t have a big budget to allocate for my wardrobe. I always wonder how some mothers manage to buy some nice pricy items because raising kids can be expensive.
Full of noise, full of mess.
This is the first one I did:
Step 11: Laser
Of the cynically
These have more good stuff all over them than the original. I was under a time crunch on that one. You can see it and what the insides of all of them looked like HERE.
I ate mine as-is, but it might look nice served with a dollop of Greek yogurt or crème fraîche and a sprinkle of something green, minced (maybe chive).
Today, the grown-ups are still a little queasy, the young-uns just fine, though Teagan’s appetite is still a bit diminished. Ashlin? Well, she could eat the horse, and the saddle, and the shoes…
5) Dragonball Evolution
6 method
The first 5 batches failed miserably (yes, 5 batches! which equals to about 150 macarons or 300 individual shells), I had no idea what went wrong. Out of desperation, I switched to French Meringue method and see if it would make any difference and it came out perfect! Although the texture is somewhat different that IM method, but they've got to be done no matter what. It was a crazy time indeed and I still remember how everything was rushed in the middle of the night. The macarons were filled with rose-flavored buttercream.
Steeling wheel turns by turning whole toy not just wheel.
My muse must be feeling nostalgic this week as she keeps leading me to things related to time. When I went through my Wreck This Journal it fell open to a page with directions to document the passing of time. Both the writer and history teacher in me got down to business on this page.
Also in the "most powerful" question is the weighting of multiple rounds on target. A bolt action .50bmg rifle is capable of doing a lot of damage with a single round; but a machine gun in .308 can put 100 rounds downrange before the .50 can put two... and that is certainly more gross damage potential, but is it "more powerful" ?
The mountains of Ararat were Noah’s ark landed (according to Genesis 8: 4) is due north from the Land of Shinar (Babylon). It is logical to assume that Noah and his family would have settled in that vicinity or in a suitable region very close to where the ark came to rest. In modern times this region would be either Turkey, Armenia, Georgia, or even Syria --- all located North or slightly North-West from the ancient Land of Shinar, and NOT EAST!
Because of the craziness I didn’t get to jog/walk but did do 30 minutes on the elliptical.
All she was then told by the BSF that her husband could have been captured as a PoW by Pakistan, or perhaps, may have even died in gunfire. His fate was sealed in 1974 when the BSF officially declared him dead, a martyr in their records.
We’ve packed tools, paint brushes, and our moving clothes. Boxes, carts, and dollies are waiting to be put into action. We’ve done our squatting, lifting, and weight-bearing exercises. We are prepared. Forget about the aches and pains we may endure. Our daughter is moving to a permanent place. Bring it on!
- 12/23/1941: Wake Island surrendered to Japanese forces
There's a few in the Home Ec book, both involve cooking the rice in milk. That has to make them creamier, right? One in particular involves cooking the rice, then baking the pudding...ooooo, long cooking time, let's go for it!
Local councillors are only elected by a minority of voters and are not therefore fully representative of the public. We need to campaign against the destruction of our towns and cities as well as many other things. It must be part of a British movement and informed and propelled by the “Intellectual Frontline” we have.
Who was your biggest celebrity crush?
The recipe dapples far enough into Italian influences to be considered Italian but like so many of my favorite offerings, this recipe has just enough charm of Creole and southern flavorings to make it a classic standard in our house. In fact, this is one I am adopting and will repeat many times. Thank your Aunt Ida and Big Mama who ever you are.
Diving in this series, I thought that it will be serious and action packed with full military combat. I was a bit skeptical and hesitant. But for the love of Lee Seung Gi, I just brushed that off and proceeded anyway. I’m so glad I did. It isn’t as heavy after all. I enjoyed watching it and want more.
Have bought a couple of new masks from Crafter's Workshop, this one with the branch and birdies is one of them and immediately became my new fave. I used a finger sponge to stipple TH distress ink first in Antique Linen and then in Vintage Photo. I think it gives the image a soft and hazy feel.
Not only that. It was not only the case that German capitalists followed Hitler, rather than led him, it was also the case that Hitler never really gave up on the vital parts of his socialism – even after the capitalists had come on board.
Hi Everyone....
Once the coyote realized it had jumped a human, not a hen, it sprinted away.
And sure enough, when I was in Guatemala last March I took a group of kids up La Muela. They wanted to go. They took me to places on the dead volcano I’d never been. As we stood at the summit, looking down on Xela, one of the boys, who’d grown up in Xela, right next to La Muela, looked at me and said, “I love hiking. I can see why you love Xela too.” Pleased, I felt like a success.
no, no, my neighbor caryl has a basement press where she hand prints her books. she has an intriguing and expansive definition of book. one of my favorites is “confection” which is really a candy box with word blocks in the individual ruffled paper candy holders.
Since this usually happens in the morning I always end up freaking out more than I should. My brain isn’t working quite right yet. Feelings are a little distorted at that time of the day. There are still occasions where this has happened during the day, when I’m more than awake, but these are quite rare. It usually involves me mistakenly chewing on a fork or something.
“We all have very strong interests in reclamation and also in improving our ability to accomplish good land reclamation in the challenging environments we have in Wyoming,” said Wolff.
The tables below show subsidy payments in the five years preceding 2011:
The Lord with the sound of a trumpet.
- grosgrain ribbon from stash (I bought this ages ago from QVC, loads of spools in all shades - not much on each spool, but it always seems to come to the rescue)
I was happy – most of the time – because I was with the man I loved. But when you spend so much time working and that you don’t even have a bit of money to enjoy yourself, life becomes hard. Really hard. So I tried to speak to him. several times. I said I either wanted free time to work somewhere else, or he should pay me for my work. He always said no. To him, we were both working for our future, I didn’t need money as he would always look after me.
Anyway, I just wanted to write this real quick while I had the chance. I’ll be writing soon!
Spot the Monster
Nice week at work, and on Thursday morning, I went to the Gare du Nord. As usual, and don't know why, I missed my train.
Inventing Muhammad?
Chris smiled. “I meant you could stand on the sidewalk and do a cameo; all the authors do it.”
There was a trial run of the competition on Tuesday with Bexhill High school students. The students, aged 12, were asked to build a cardboard chair that would hold the weight of a Brighton University final year product design student, Sam. Two teams successfully designed and built cardboard chairs to fit this criteria and their teacher decided that the designs were so good that they were both named as joint winners. A lovely, fun day was had by all!
Burton also mentioned a “six-figure” Democrat donation/bribe to Jesse Jackson to buy his silence about Israel. On October 14, 2008 Jackson told fellow attendees in at the World Policy Forum in Evian France a ‘President Obama’ would “remove the clout of Zionists who have controlled American policy for decades.”
For example, Vantiv is only the first processor to certify an NFC/EMV system, but there are a few more processors in the marketplace. Whether or not they follow suit over time remains to be seen, but the predicate case has been established.
But how can an imitator best an innovator? At home and in school, we have been taught to abhor copying. Be original – all the generations living today have been told. How can something wrong give better results than the good?
We want to be a part of your story. Show us how.
I want to put a heart sticker on everything.
We all become that old codger telling the kids their music is shit compared to what we went through. I like to think I’m more open minded but I’m no different. I’ve been hoping for the next youth explosion of music for a while now and instead I’ve regressed into loving old 60’s R&B along with golden age Hip Hop with occasional forays into rediscovering hardcore thrash classics I lost touch with. If the latest and greatest for today’s generation is Dub-Step I feel sorry for the kids today. At least Nu-Metal died a million deaths so the kids aren’t completely without taste. I was bitching about this a while back and a friend remarked that music has gone downhill since they took music out of the public schools and maybe there’s something to be said for that?
Intro to Communication is stupid.
At 7 I showered, and I was actually out the door at 7:30 (on time for once) and headed south to work.
One wonders what Wordsworth would have made of it? He, of course, hailed the French Revolution with the famous line:
This would have been the perfect piece of jewelry to wear today and unfortunately it was a missed opportunity. My mistake was not keeping it out in plain sight so I had it to choose from at a moment's notice.
For those were crude and cruel days, and human flesh was cheap.
And tumbled in a fit.
8:15 Jack Hess arrived and stayed until 8:45. He says he's "not giving anything" to the Quadrangle even though he is on the board.
One final thing before we proceed — let’s talk a moment about Google Voice accounts. When you create a Google Voice account, it is a very good idea to first create a new Gmail account that you won’t actually use for e-mail, then tie the Google Voice account to that. Don’t tie your Google Voice account to your primary e-mail address because the account password has to be stored in plain text in the jabber.conf configuration file (so if someone hacks your Asterisk box, they could get into your e-mail account) AND because whenever you are logged into Gmail, there is some chance you might not receive incoming calls. So unless you are very attached to a particular Google Voice number (or managed to snag one in a Frontier exchange while they were still up for grabs), get a new Gmail account, use a good strong password when you create it, and then open your Google Voice account from there. And when you set up your Google Voice account, be sure to set it to forward to Google Chat, and be sure that Call Screening is off, that Caller ID (incoming) is set to Display caller’s number, that Do Not Disturb is NOT enabled (at least not whenever you actually want to receive calls!), and that Call Options are NOT enabled.
‘Problem with the heating,’ I say. ‘Should be fixed in a couple of days.’
Even they are bitter and warm,
Pop Pop, Mom, Uncle Bob and Aunt Dee told me right before she peacefully passed that she lifted her head up to say something to them, but they could not understand her. I like to think she was saying I’ll see you soon in paradise.
Your tax dollars will go to those who don't earn and don't pay. In South Africa, organizations that used to have access to state funds such as old age homes, the arts, and veterans' services, are simply abandoned.
TN2,TN7,TN8 for her hair, PL1, PL2, PP1,PP3 for the clothes, FS6 for Harley
Secondly, some of you may read Kendra's (Grandmother Goddess of the Garden) blog Barely Controlled Chaos. This woman was touched by Mimi's and Julian's story. She felt that Mimi, Michelle from My Semblance of Sanity, and I should meet in person and she made that a reality. She was able to get all three of us tickets to Oprah's show! Mimi, Michelle, and I have been busy making our plans to meet up in Chicago for the show. And then today I got an email from Kendra's daughter. It said that she was in the hospital and had just had emergency brain surgery to remove a tumor earlier this week. She was diagnosed with mestastatic lung cancer. :*( This was a huge shock to her. Anyway, please keep Kendra in your thoughts/prayers.
“Twitter has worked well. It has been the most effective social web site in terms of organizing help. Several earthquake victims were found and rescued thanks to the post on Twitter. This is very important, I think. It gives local news about what exactly is needed where.”
I have a lot to write about but for now, I feel compelled for the world to know (or at least the 4 people who read my blog) about this ooey-gooey deliciousness I just made. I saw this recipe on Thursday and contemplated making them that night. But I didn't have all the ingredients so I made them today. If you absolutely love chocolate and carmel, I suggest you stop reading this now - go to the store, buy cake mix, Rolos, and evaporated milk. Then you, too, can indulge in this fabulousness!
3. Revise your content
Hubby is away on business and so it is quiet in the house today.
_____I went out this morning and got donuts for the kids but ate them all on the way back home....f**k them.
In total, including two bidons of water, it comes to just shy of 16kg.
I don’t know.
Subject at your envelope/email: MT-MPD
Why do we want it good all the time, why do we get angry at God when he doesn’t do stuff the way we expected him to. We’re like Israel, when they were fed daily by the miracle of manna they complained and whined. They wanted the strong flavours of Egypt. Israel’s shopping list to Moses was all the smelly, strong tasting foods: fish, cucumbers, melons (cantaloupe was popular in Egypt and the Egyptian cucumber is particularly sweet and welcome in the heat), leeks and garlic. ‘We don’t want manna,’ they basically clamored, ‘we want the good stuff.’ This is all in Numbers 11, get a Bible out if you want.
Mama's Gluten Free Pancake Mix
If you all remember I was doing "Take The Weight off Tuesdays" I'll be 100% honest, I haven't done well at all since I haven't been feeling well. I did one workout and couldn't finish it. I still want to try to lose the weight I wanted plus the weight I gained. I'm now at 167.8 :( I'm just going to take it slow for now. I'll be eating every 3 hours again (I know that will take the pounds off without working out) and we will see how I feel. If I do anything I'll let you all know!
To shoe enthusiasts out there, you may recognise these shoes as part of the Celine Spring 2010 Clog collection. I actually purchased another replica of these shoes from wholesale7.net in a different style (review here).
Yes perhaps I am pinning a life that wont ever be mine but I don’t care because it’s all just SO PRETTY!!!! In fact it makes me feel EXACTLY like Agnes in this clip sometimes:
It should shock the conscience of Americans that museums can use statutes of limitations to hold onto stolen art, the acquisition of which has been subsidized by U.S. taxpayers. Rich people should not be able to avoid paying taxes by taken art stolen from Jews in the Holocaust and putting it into U.S. museums where it is hidden from scrutiny - often for decades.
Freedom of expression should be defended and more importantly the Orthodox Church should not be above criticism.
opened the door
I wrote some time back about sensing a shift in blogging, about it becoming more community based. It's here and I've just noticed that it generated more comments than any other post. That's because there are a thousand different reasons why an individual keeps a blog and each one of them is valid. The reasons for not blogging are just as valid but they don't form the basis of an argument that blogging has declined. They just mean the person doesn't have the time or the inclination which is absolutely fine.
Paper - Botanical Gazette DSP, more mustard, very vanilla, chocolate chip card stock
What about you? What is your favorite book of all time?
In terms of finding albums the trend seems to towards showing ever larger photos of the album covers, which is nice to look at, but if you’re looking at an artist with lots of albums, it makes it hard to find a particular one.
in supermarket aisles,
Makes significant contributions to the full project life cycle (development to deployment) of IT projects as well as provide support for SQL Databases and SharePoint applications. Resolves technical problems which require knowledge of Microsoft software development tools and technologies which includes but not limited to: C#, ASP.NET, Microsoft SharePoint Server (MOSS) 2007, and SQL Server 2005 or greater. Serve as the main resource for technical concerns which involves developing, deploying, monitoring and maintaining new applications as well as providing post-implementation technical support. Responsible for managing the technical interfaces, including hands-on testing, modelling and interfacing with development. In addition, this resource will need to work both independently and in conjunction with a project team.
Anyway, there’s trouble in paradise because Se Na sees that Yi Gak isn’t quite interested in her. I can understand her confusion given how crazy he used to act around her. She’s sure Park Ha is the source of their problems but Yi Gak quickly comes to her defense which in turn confirms things for Se Na.
ACTOR TYPE #2: Good Actors.
I just updated Osaka Monogatari (I hope you like it as soon as you click the link) and if you’d notice, this was my original draft that just have to come out from my mind. Lawl, I’ll never gonna be a good story-teller.
I don't have a full tutorial on this, but I can give you details if you are interested. Just send an email to Faith's Place
Sidepods
3 out of 5 – Positive messages – Teamwork, fellow loyalty, and doing deeds are probably the “big three” of this book under these circumstances. Smiley also shows a bit of compassion even during the village’s besiege. Teamwork is represented in the book’s warfare, fellow loyalty is represented in the many packs in the book, like Gran’ma and Phoney, Fone Bone and Thorn, and doing deeds is represented when Thorn finally seeks the Crown of Horns. Oh, whoops, did I just spoil the ending? And we also learn that ever since he found a chest of gold, kids, whatever you do, don’t be a Phoney Bone.
2) When your hole is made test to make sure the pump tube will fit. You might need to drill holes side by side for some of the pumps that have oblong shaped upper pieces for the pump mechanism. If needed you can use a pair of pliers to bend down to finish any rough edges.
“A local legend says that Loch Tay was formed when she forgot to leave a flagstone lid on a magical spring well.”
I told her Harold would meet her right away, done deal, and hung up.
Peas, beans, onions can all go in. I put the onions in no more than three-quarters of an inch deep. Don’t forget to hoe the weeds off and pull the soil away as they get a bit bigger.
I approached him but there was something wrong. And then I saw that Neil was completely wasted, drunk. He was incoherent. I wasn't even sure he recognized me. I begun to panic.
Remember the days of Myspace and Friendster? They used to be fun. Checking your Myspace or Friendster profile was fun. It was not compulsory for you to check on those sites every minute. There was no wall of your friend's activities back then, still it was fun. There was such a thrill when a friend posted a testimonial - especially if they were just spontaneous about it. Another thing I noticed is that people actually connected on those days despite the limitations given on those days. That I believe is the infancy of social media.
3 stripsroasted red peppers
what your bpm and sr should be
* 2 bedrooms
This round I also want to continue to improve my fitness, tone up the arms more, lose more 'jiggly bits' off my tumm yand hip/thigh area, I would like to get better at running and improve my stamina.
I was prompted on several occasions while reading through this book to write complete essays in contradiction to Grudem’s positions. (Maybe I still will through the coming month. You can start looking forward for those.) In many cases he uses bad information, relies on traditional values, and assumes the reader agrees with his premise. He quotes Aristotle, a totalitarian, on defining marriage. He uses gross logical fallacies to build his argument on national defense. Some of what he says is completely accurate, particularly about the environment and special interest groups. But in other areas he contradicts himself when suggesting that the public school system is flawed and then presenting how he would fix it without actually restructuring it. Furthermore, He wrote this several years ago before current events that would contradict several things he said. He suggest that nuclear power plants present little to no risk as a form of energy. Something I think he would retract in light of the tragedy in Japan. He supported Mitt Romney in the 2008 nomination, and he makes a special effort to attack Ron Paul. In many ways, this book already has an expiration date and it is already a couple years old.
All right chickens, we’re getting to the end of the week.
There was nothing else for it. Going purely on instinct, I stood in the middle of my garden, in full view of all of my neighbours, and barked and growled at the puppy. This strange behaviour brought him up short, and he stared at me in fascinated horror. Even Gladys considered me in a careful manner, as if appeasing a person who has just broken out of a mental asylum. Now that the chicken was safe and the dog had stopped in it's tracks, I realised I could probably...stop.
Is it more convenient to persuade ourselves that it is important to hold on it than let it go?
I have been trying to update my wardrobe; I am my own new project. I have a dear cousin who lives in Paris (France, not Texas), and I get to see him every couple of years. He was back in the US visiting family and so we were able to meet up with him and a couple of extended family members for lunch (it was supposed to be dinner but the last snowstorm put the kibosh on that). He is the stereotypical sophisticated European these days, and I realized that I didn't want to be the stereotypical boring suburban Midwestern housewife (at least not anymore). So I am chipping away at my horrible wardrobe.
There are lots of things I never think about. Close friends and family know the unwritten code. We never talk prognosis or consider "what-ifs" We pretend that we don't know how high my risk of bowel cancer is or how badly my osteoperotic bones have already been eroded. But most of all, we don't discuss the TPN people.
It wasn’t a large canteen at all. When he tilted it back to drink from it the water was cool and crisp, and more refreshing than it should have been, likely the reason he drank all of it. When the final drops hit his tongue he panicked slightly as he held it out in front of himself.
The one that no-one really saw coming. Do I need to even explain? For un-explainable reasons a beginner has never seen before luck and ends up thrashing pros. A seriously realistic power seeing it exists in our daily lives and one both make people laugh from the suddeness or get pissed at. Only one known character, Kaori Senoo.
I have to say that moving to a new city is a little daunting for me, but now knowing I already have a friend there makes me feel more at ease. Besides that, I already have my first knitting lesson lined up with Judy when I settle in! :-)
I really haven't got any remedies for this situation, but I hope it works out for Toby in the end. He's passionate about what he does and he needs more support, regardless of how old you are. As for The Galileo 7 themselves, they had more energy coming from them than many bands half their age do, so here's a middle-aged cliche for you: go see them and rock before you drop. Otherwise you could be in danger of wasting the rest of your lives in front of computer screens reading middle-aged moans like this one.
Studio G mini stamp with bling- pear stamp- 1.50 BRAND NEW
You will want to read Beast. The reptilian eye staring at you from the cover will make sure of that. In fact, if you like good YA fiction you will probably have read it already. I don't know why I hadn't til now. After all, I saw that cover first of all in a prospectus for the writing MA I was about to take, where Ally is a well remembered past graduate. Like I said, the eye's been watching me. I suppose I knew it had the patience of a crocodile lurking in the shallows. It could wait, because we both knew it was going to get me in the end.
“(She) still has that naive girlishness, offers excellent sweet young thing, girlfriend experience….Advance booking for (her) is required, don’t leave it to least minute booking as it always almost won’t work!”
Boy: "I don't think it's that long a flight, like an hour and a half. For flights that short, I think the time change is only 30 minutes."
Dear Ryan,
In Bulgaria ACTA was dumped in favor of a law that supposedly regulates gambling. Yeah, right. In the immortal words of Ali G: “Talk to the hand, coz di face, it ain’t listenin!”
there is simply nothing more beautiful in my book.
I met a strange lady, she made me nervous
If you find a gecko in your house don't kill it (unless you're scared of it)...I mean don't kill it if you're scared, just go away.
In the birding community, if a person sees a rare bird, it is customary to get a picture of it to prove the authenticity of the sighting. When we saw the Brown Creeper that I mentiond in my previous post, I got out of the car to try and get some shots of it. It was scrambling around, moving fast through the trees. I tried to get it in my sights and when I was able to, I fired off what shots I could get. Some went wild, and my shots went off in the air, so to speak. A few made “contact”. That was why I said that none of my images were publishable.
While telling the story of Brooklyn is inevitably impossible, Golenbock pretty much punts on the present-day borough, telling the story of the 1980s through the 21st century via only nine people, two of them developers.
"Lol. But that's beautiful! And perfect!"
We were heartened, that we knew so much, about each other’s happiness,
I love the lines of the chairs, but I want to de-formalize them. Is that a word, de-formalize?
So I decided to make some changes, work being one of the more major ones. It felt scary, ridiculous and good. You know the feeling you get when you feel like you’re watching a movie of yourself – distant from deadlines and headlines, and either the others are ‘real’ and you aren’t, or vice versa? That is how I felt… kind of surreal but more real than ever, all at once.
I have heard my husband mention this blog, The Art Of Non-conformity, from time to time over the past weeks and months. I knew that Chris, the bogger, was a world traveler and that he made his living writing and blogging. My impression of him was that he was living a pretty amazing life in alignment with his unique values, but that we probably didn’t have much in common. I’m a picture-taking, yoga-practicing, deeply rooted mother of four while he is a childless writer, entrepreneur and globetrotter. Reading his words humbled me once again. We are all undeniably connected, aren’t we?
Luckily there were only minor casualities
Marc Emery has 10 suggestions for improving life in British Columbia:
The press release for Intercooler’s third album, Time To Let Go has hints of political expression. They’re embracing the past. They’re looking bravely forward. Perhaps all that’s left is to wear a hard-hat and kiss a baby?
those Golden ones and the Silvery one turned out to be Koi and they were thriving in this natural pond so we bought a load more. They too thrived and we had some humongous fish that we loved to sit and watch and feed.
During all of the driving and waiting involved in this trip my mother and I were reading many books. She was on her Kindle reading the Hunger Games Trilogy and I was reading various things on mine. She was happy because she finished the second book and was able to download the third book and keep right on reading without too much hassle. She paid $7 or so dollars for her book. My books were less, they were all $1.99.
I slapped one tofu slab onto a toasted english muffin, hoping for a little cheesy sauce inside.
Contemporary Administrator
The Men
Always thought she’d give up on me one day,
As a surprise pressie I received a copy of this book from my husband this weekend. Strangely despite my drinking habits and enjoyment of pubs I don't buy beer or pub guides although I do have a copy of the Good Beer Guide on my iPad but again that was the other half loading it on before giving me the thing. However it is a very very good book to get a bit of history of the pub you are currently sitting in or thinking of getting to. The maps that head each section are clear and useful, which should make the process of finding some of them easier.
I don’t put much stock in horoscopes. I read them for the entertainment value they offer sometimes. I read mine the other day. It was definitely entertaining – in a sad sort of way. “Every once in a while, good things come our way without us expending too much effort. However, it isn’t one of those times. If you want something, you need to work for it.” No kidding!
1 cup firmly packed light brown sugar
His comment reinforced criticism voiced on Monday by Defence Minister Ahmad Vahid, who was quoted by the Al-Alam channel as saying: “Such deployments in the region are both harmful and useless. They are mostly done to create a psychological trend and a sense of insecurity in the region.”US officials speaking on condition of anonymity on Monday said an unspecified number of F-22 Raptors had been sent to the Al-Dhafra air base in the United Arab Emirates.
That's all you want.
(Said in my best Meg Ryan voice....or is that too much information! LOL)
Peter Cruddas, of CMC plc
**Share 7 things about yourself.
9) 19th Century J. N. Darby, early leader of the Plymouth Brethren: "This re-appearance of the doctrine of freewill serves to support that of the pretension of the natural man to be not irremediably fallen, for this is what such doctrine tends to. All who have never been deeply convicted of sin, all persons in whom this conviction is based on gross external sins, believe more or less in freewill" (Man’s So-called Freewill, p. 1).
This marks my 100th blog post. I'm home with the boy today. It's fitting since I started this whole thing by staying home with the boy in the first place.
Amalia’s owner, Pia, and I would ride together a lot. Poseidon (my horse) was a year younger than Amalia and very nervous to say the least. Amalia loved him. He was so easy. Sometimes she would go looking for something to get scared of, just to see him fly off the handle when she jumped. I swear she was laughing every time she got him to jump for a flower of a tree.
I have been smoking much less cigarettes lately. Last week I had no more than 30. Which is incredible because I usually smoked about 200.
She sighed. “What about that nice blouse that Grandma Joan got you for Christmas?” She sighed again and studied my shoes. “And I could lend you my silver heels. Those would really make an impression.”
Maybe I’m cynical but I don’t buy it. I think everyone has an ulterior motive.
The evolution of modular kitchen has succeeded in bringing about an enormous change in the way a kitchen appears. Traditional kitchens are being replaced by these sophisticated and elegant kitchen designs. The need for more space or limited space in homes and flats has contributed to the emergence of such modern kitchens.
I love so many of the blogs that I read. My favorite are the personal blogs. They really make me feel like I'm forming friendships, and in a way, I suppose I am with some, even if it's restricted to a computer screen. I am so honored when they share their lives -drama filled or not, their peaceful or stressed out days, things that make them happy or whatever is going on. I also love fashion blogs. :) I have one at Kaboodle. Not nearly as active as this one, but I do have one.
1) Debut of author Kieran Kramer
I am still on Step 3 of Bonnie Hunters Orca mystery - I will get it done!! And no, I have not made any blks in the the next steps like she recommends - I just want to pretend I am not behind!!
Years later...and I have to admit, I am completely unsure how long. I think eight years, but for some reason thought fifteen, and I know that's wrong. Anyway, that missing PVC was one of, if not the first thing I ever bought on eBay. He's not articulated. The balance on his three-point stance is a little iffy. The paint is slightly better than you could do yourself; ditto the sculpt.
1 teaspoon nutmeg
I'd like to finish a meal without trying to hoover it in or giving half of it to little people. I'd like to read more than a paragraph at a time of my book. I'd like to breathe, and drink my coffee before it gets cold and I have to throw it in the microwave.
Here’s the recipe. And guess what? It only took me half an hour to do and it’s healthier than using white vinegar regardless of whether it is the non-petroleum type or not. These pickles are actually fermented…and as Martha Stewart would say, “That’s a good thing!” Fermented foods have enzymes that help our digestion.
I don't understand why. Why, if other countries in Europe manage to have decent health and transport infrastructure, can't the UK manage it? Why do people in the UK have to pay so much to use shoddy train services? Why do so many people have to go private to get decent healthcare? Why does the head of the Royal College of Midwives have to begrudge women getting excited about ultrasound scans, instead of focussing on sorting out the chronic shortage of qualified staff?
Now back to the original post:
The footwork drill
Buster helped with the pups as much as possible, but I’m sure he and Gabby were both relieved when the nine went to their new homes. After that, it was the just the three of them, our little dog family. They’re all gone now, but they have left us with so many amazing memories. I’m sure one day they’ll feel like happy memories again.
I talked to all of my neighbors in advance, asked for their support and arrived at the hearing with four letters of support. My variance was approved and after the three-month application and hearing process, we were ready to begin construction.
Being mature.
apple blossom honey, walnut and banana loaf
can you have too much of a good thing?
Now for this weeks challenge, chosen by me, Mindy. I'm sure you all wont be surprised what I've chosen. I want to see Pink, Purple and Pearls on your creations! I just love the girly stuff!
“A few days before Christmas…”
Should you get an eReader? It depends on your own tastes and preferences. If you usually have a long commute or travel often and prefer the portability of an eReader, this may be good for you. Unlike smartphones and tablets, eReaders are usually pretty easy to use. If you love HD video, music and games, then you may either want to consider a tablet/ereader hybrid like the Kindle Fire or Kobo Vox, or going straight to a full tablet and download the Kobo app or use their built in ebook capabilities (like iBook). I would also check your local library for .epub books (an Adobe ebook format that is compatible with most but NOT ALL eReaders). But if you just like the feel of a beautiful new hardcover in your hands… sorry, there’s no app for that.
I was on a pedestal...
Everyone even at this moment
Comments requested.
“You miss the point,” Ruster sulked, and returned to his reading.
Since it originally became very popular in 1992, it's pretty likely Daniel Quinn's book 'Ishmael' is old news to you. I'm sure I passed it by any number of times during my weekly sojourns to Powell's in Portland but one day last week when Crow was going through some documents he came across a picture taken of him and his old friend years ago. We talked about Ishmael's views regarding how humanity divided into two distinct groups about 10,000 years ago when agriculture first gained a foothold around the fertile crescent of the Tigris and Euphrates Rivers. The people who elected to stay in one place to farm the land Ishmael called Takers while the ones who preferred to continue their wandering ways he identified as Leavers.
Diaby came in for the injured Song at the start of the second half.
Do I hate this about myself? No. In fact, while there are still times that it greatly irks me, there are other times when I love this piece of personality. This is the same part of me responsible for many of the things I love most about myself; spontaneity, passion, compassion, etc.; so there is no way that I can actually hate it. Not now, anyway… but I did once.
13. A range of physical manifestations: Headaches, backaches, neck pains, flu-like symptoms (this is called vibrational flu), digestive problems, muscular spasms or cramps, racing heartbeat, chest pains, changes in sexual desire, numbness or pain in the limbs, and involuntary vocalizations or bodily movements. Some of us have even had old conditions from childhood reappear briefly for healing.
The cutest idea, easily adapted to singing time, is "Feast of the Prophets" found on page 24 of the August 2001 issue of the Friend magazine. Those people are ingenious! Each of these paper plates holds a teaching, an experience, or a revelation from a prophet. The plates represent a feast of counsel and direction from both ancient and modern prophets. Their teachings nourish our souls the way food nourishes our bodies.
Clear, light gold color with a thin white head. Smells nice; sweet vaguely grainy. Thicker mouth feel than I expected. Grainy but robust taste. Somewhat dry at the finish. Puts me in mind of what our dad’s beers probably tasted like back in the good old days.
I became a romantic, a writer of poetry,
Hansson E, Jansa S, Wande H, Källén B, Östlund E. Pregnancy outcome for women working in laboratories in some of the pharmaceutical industries in Sweden. Scand J Work Environ Health 1980; 6: 131-134.
They smeared my name and reputation all over the World news, forced me to have to turn and voluntarily travel to Norway to prove that I was not Breivik’s English ‘mentor’. Even after this they did absolutely nothing to rectify my position by claiming I am still a witness in the case which then left me and my family to bear the brunt of such heinous accusations over the past 8 months with nobody except me and those investigating the case knowing the truth. Not only all of this but what I have had to personally endure because of this.
Over the past year, I have heard more than one NPR report on “food deserts”: low-income neighborhoods where decently nutritious food choices are not available within a reasonable distance and/or for manageable prices. So out of convenience, residents eat processed garbage from, well, convenience stores.
I make others read it out loud to me.
Besides the obvious holiday fare, our family even has traditional foods for certain occasions. For my birthday, for instance, my husband and kids will always make something (anything) grilled, corn on the cob and watermelon. My daughter makes key lime pie every father's day. Thanksgiving means pumpkin cheesecake (I can't stand the texture of pumpkin pie.) Christmas eve we make a huge batch of clam chowder (don't ask me why.) When one of us older kids come home, my mom makes her famous apple pancakes.
“Please,” she prayed fiercely. “Oh God, please.” It was a formless entreaty, made many times before, but this time, with those hands on her shoulders, she knew she was being listened to. She offered up her great love for every bit of her life on this wonderful, flawed, generous earth. The long journey from Jamaica with Mam and Pop. The first cold winter, school, her marriage to Daniel, the births of Jasmyn, Dillan and Joel. She offered her cancer, her anger, her fear. She offered everything and hoped it would be enough. Because now it was Christmas Day, and she’d already seen two miracles. Surely a third wasn’t too much to ask.
at its might.
I absolutely LOVED both the blushes. Prim & Proper is a gorgeous peach that looks slightly pink on me. It's more matte for me than it is shimmery but it still manages to give a pretty glow. It's the peachy color that I was looking for.
Well, I really hope you all like this card and you could find something that inspires you.....
2. How did you/will you know you're with the right one?
Juan Amalbert:Drums,Conga; Bobby Capers:Alto,Tenor; Manny Ramos:Drums,Timbales; Bill Ellington:Bass; Willy Gardner:Piano; Willie Rivens:Vibes; Victor Allende:Flute
“He has a vision,” said Cordero, adding that Mangal reminded him of George Washington and his mission fighting the British.
I remember a time years ago when I had to drive back through and I'd been in the car with screaming sick babies for 20 minutes already. This was not exactly the same as my kids were fine watching a movie, but we were ready to go home regardless.
Homework- Give each student a Test #3 for their parents to go over with them to review what we have done in class. Parents need to help their child fill this out and bring back to class the following week. Students that complete their homework and bring it back to class will be able to play Homeworkopoly. Each Sunday the students make a mini story book and/or story wheel in class. Students need to read these to their parents (or the parents read to them) the mini book and/or story wheel for homework.
Granulated sugar - 1/4 cup
Now a savaging beast
The fields stand still in dead calm
And it's no big surprise
Mandy by Julie Edwards. I read this book as a child, and actually remembered details about the plot. I thought that having a secret place all my own would be the coolest thing ever. I came across one in a used bookstore (thump, thump), and I figured that it was about time for Amanda to read it. We read it aloud, and she, too, was pulled into the story just as I had been. It was so wonderful to share it with her.
*arrived late, so no whole food in the house until after shopping tuesday
throughout his injury-plagued career and offers great intangibles with a great football IQ and understanding of the game along with the
6) I rewrote A Hen in the Wardrobe at a more leisurely speed, taking all the criticisms on board.
She learned to read when she was 11. Her primary school put her in with “the thickos” – never officially referred to as that, of course, but we had them at my school too: the kids who sat at the side of the class in a special group of desks and weren’t expected to keep up with the rest. She was given picture books to look at, and ignored: her teachers assumed she was stupid. A friend – not me – taught her how to read when she was 11, and she figured out writing much the same way I did. She fought her way to pass Highers and qualify for nurse training, because she assumed she would never be able to pursue a career that required much from her in reading or writing.
I turn away. Without my help she will make it home. She will crawl back in our bed and in an hour or so will come down to our kitchen with no memory of this. She may notice her dirty feet or she may not. She will take my hand from across the table and, with eyes matching her words, tell me she loves me.
Got any beauty buys you love?
Q&A on Volunteering
S:playing star wars outside with her
1 T butter melted
“But why didn’t you ring the gate bell?”
Shangri-La’s Mactan Resort & Spa
I do confess, however, that leaderless movements with a loose agenda make me somewhat anxious. That way madness and anarchy lie. A hodge-podge of ideas as springboard for a more coherent and cogent arguments is very welcome. The danger is that historically out of the chaos come totalitarianism and autocracy, being led, ironically, by a charismatic demagogue. I don't think the Occupy movement is heading that way yet, but at some point, I think it should narrow down its political, social and economical demands to something we, the public, can recognise and vote for. Given the grim future facing many in the UK nowadays, even Jesus would have joined the protesters at St Paul's cathedral. Which, by the way, taking into account the church's attitude towards the Occupy movement, would have been very funny.
Statistically, as even the sainted Barrak Obama admits, black men are far more likely than white men to abandon their partners and families. When the partner is white and the children mixed race they are even more likely to be abandoned, as the regiments of poverty stricken white girls living on benefits as they attempt, with varying degrees of success, to raise mixed race children will testify.
well, i don't really follow any blogs that are not photography blogs of some sort. the ones i do follow are either strictly for photography or a blend of photography and writing. but i don't consistently visit any that are solely writing... although that may change as of today. i was intrigued when i read in the e-mail about the blog called keitharsis. this blurb about him and his blog was what hooked me...
Use your imagination and make sure you write the words in a gift note attached. The words and the visual make the difference in that moment. It reminds them they are on the right path and focused on your customers/patients/students, …
about and how these things are still going on cloaked in other guises,” said Gordon, “and also about all of us, as humans, our knee-jerk rush to create a story that makes sense out of anything that happens. Is any of that ever true and how fast do we do it, and how fast are we departing from the truth?”
We demand the immediate stand-down of the INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE
I think this woman is gorgeous. Her face is so peaceful and she mirrors the Buddha so wonderfully. As you go through the ruins at all the sites at Angkor, people have set up makeshift altars where you can leave offerings for the Buddha or burn incense. This was one such altar. She was wonderful. She beckoned me in and I burned incense and she said some words over me. There are female monks in Buddhism, they wear white and shave their heads, however they are not given the exhalted treatment of the monks and are treated "as any other woman". I love this picture. One of my favorites, and one of my favorite memories as well. I got teary eyed many times on this whole trip, my spiritual side was continually challenged and awakened.
One big negative point is that they don’t have sampler sets. Another was that the service was fairly slow. The staff (four people) seemed to be very busy and not terribly friendly, rushing around at their tasks, even though the place wasn’t all that crowded. It took a bit of time to place an order. The food menu looked much better than regular pub grub, though I didn’t order anything. I've heard that the fries, the mussels, and their other Belgian dishes are especially good
I realize now (and I'd known before but seemed to have forgotten) that....well, there's always more than one way to get to a destination, a goal. It's not always cut-and-dry, it's not always easy. Nothing is easy in life--that's what my family continues to say to me. But I should be grateful for all that has happened this year, both good and bad. I've learned a lot this year, maybe more than in previous years. I suppose it's always like that: each new year brings along new lessons.
4T Frank’s Red Hot cayenne pepper sauce
I don’t tend to read much magical realism, but Allen’s writing has a wonderfully simple, cozy quality that makes it the perfect read for a summer day.
It was at least triple overhead.
Arnaldur Indridason, the son of a novelist, was born in 1961 and, after studying history at Reykjavik University, took up journalism and film criticsm as a career. He published his first novel at the age of 34 and since then he has gained widespread acclaim, is now one of the foremost contemporary novelists in Iceland and has won awards for his crime fiction.
Road #2 was bumpy! And we put the truck through her paces with some 4WDing, sand bogs, ditches, and tight turns. Then all of a sudden we ended up at the coast. We still had no idea where the mob were that we were headed out to see and had to call in and ask for directions at the first camp we came to. A bit further along found a green water tank and a heap of banana trees…. Near enough! so we stopped for a chat and to find out where we were supposed to be. The view from the huts along the water was just amazing. It would be a totally different life but to just live out there on the edge of the bay would be incredible.
If you’re looking to get up a little “liquid courage” to hit the hottie at the bar with a killer pickup line, this thing is going to wear off half way through and you’ll realize you’re out of your league, wet yourself and walk away a stuttering, stammering mess.
4: SHIRLEY & LEE - Bewildered
2. Follow this blog
“There’s good beer – real local west coast ales and well-crafted brews – all over the Bay Area, and fortunately there is no paucity of good beer within walking distance of public transit,” writes BBB creators Steve Shapiro and Gail Williams.
He thought carefully. If there was any chance, he had to find something she wanted to know but could not tell from her unobstructed observation of him. He imagined himself back in his chair across from her and searched for what she had seen. He smiled and said “St. Tychon.”
Well, I let it go just as she was opening her mouth to speak. It's actually quite striking how much she swallowed. And - get this for irony! - she was just about to say 'Try not to throw up again - it's bad for your throat'! (She told me this when I phoned her in hospital later. She was recovering after having her stomach pumped, and a small operation to remove a scotch egg from her esophagus. She seemed stoical, if psychologically damaged.)
The Casino Bar & Grill: I feel a little guilty for putting this in writing, especially since the Casino is such a secret, locals-only spot. But I blame the tasting room guy at Mayo, who raved on and on about this little dive bar with extraordinary food and an ever-changing menu.
Verse fourteen gives us the result of this parable.
07. Grace
We are thrilled to announce that tomorrow for "Rare Beer Tuesday" we will be filling growlers of the Stone / 21st Amendment / Firestone Walker collaboration beer called "El Camino (Un)Real Black Ale" starting at 5pm! This is the one and only keg of this beer in the entire Southeast! Check out the reviews for it on BeerAdvocate and RateBeer! Scott Sheridan from Stone Brewing will be on hand to answer questions about this beer and all things Stone! We don't know how long this will last, so please get here at 5pm so you don't miss out!
Björk Hunter IS
infused with whispered
*All those suffering from depression, anxiety, stress, or any other mental ailment, especially those who are negatively affected by the change of seasons--those silent sufferings can be so terribly crippling, even though the one bearing them does not look sick.
Reading my very first entry, it brought back vivid memories of our maiden visit to this cottage, when Dolly was just a few months old, and Betty was two. I was completely done in, and don't think I had had any time out from my kids for quite a while. So I would get up at 6am every morning before Dolly woke to be fed, put my trainers on, and still in my pyjamas, I would go for a brisk walk to the lighthouse and back. This little lone jaunt made me feel positively euphoric,and would set me up for the day ahead - dirty nappies, sore nipples, wipes, snacks, rattles, naps, spare clothes, baby-proofing, sterilising, and whingeing.
This is what you voted for and this is what you got. We entrusted you with the Torch of Liberty and you traded it for a paycheck and a fancy house.
Most of the time, I'm pretty even-tempered. Aside from the odd nervous breakdown or caffeine-induced bliss-seizure, I have the emotional variation of sand. However, every once in a great while, I'll lapse into what I like to call a "sneaky hate spiral."
Cassandra also had them trap Rose Tyler in a room with its sun filter descending as revenge for insulting her earlier. The Adherants were discovered and shut down by the Doctor when he ripped off one of their arms. (The End of the World) via
Place the avocado, garlic, lime juice, hot sauce and jalapeno pepper into a bowl. Mash together with a fork. Stir in the tomato, green onion, and cilantro. Season with salt and pepper.
The nose is of brown sugar and dark caramel, with a hint of zingy freshness in the background. The malt is warming, rich and almost Belgian in its complexity. The middle has some rich fruitcake and spicy notes, none of the trademark charcoal of the brewery's yeast. It finishes with gentle linger of bittering, no bit stamp, and distinctive peppery notes.
So Thank You old bosses for treating me like garbage and kicking me to the curb! If it was not so socially unacceptable I would send you a card to show my appreciation. While you are missing my skills and talents my new bosses are loving me and my work.
Movie reviews include:
What great opportunity Sukarno offered little boy Bâri′!
I know from experience because my girls have had some classic Santa pictures.
A. Maybe, but probably not a good idea. Painting, like lots of things in the design world, may look easy, but isn't. A good professional painter does this every day. He has the tools and the skills to make your house look like a million bucks. Watching a pro with a good paint brush will almost make you think you're watching Van Gogh. If you can, budget for a professional.
Replace things in recipes with what you have on hand. This does not mean spinach is a perfect replacement for potatoes, but it does mean you can waver on *perfect matching* a recipe and actually have something that's more personal to your tastes. You might not even know what you personal tastes are yet as you try new things! A few things: onions can replace onions. SHOCKING, I know - but you can use any onion to replace any onion. Instead of going by cooking time, go by appearance (as, say, shallots will caramelize quicker) and remember flavour will change slightly (but, honestly, it may improve your meal as opposed to destroying it as some seem to think).
The conference should be packed with information and great networking opportunities, I can't wait. Friday it'll be back to work, but at least I'll be refreshed and invigorated with the go-getter attitude. At least that's my hope. This opportunity worked out great because I hadn't decided on a blogging conference to attend, and I like to go to one a year. Last year EVO was amazing, and the two years prior BlogHer was fun too. It should be interesting to see how this one is since it's much smaller and more personal than the others.
Second, we've been deluged with wonderful Christmas cards this year, and I feel pretty lame for not sending any out this year. Correction: I sent out about ten to old people whose feelings would be hurt if they didn't get one, but otherwise, dear friends? I love you all dearly but if you want a card, you're shit out of luck. Please consider this my Christmas offering for the year:
8. Buck – Buck Brannaman is the real-life horse whisperer. This is a documentary about him (and also, implicitly, my pick for BEST DOCUMENTARY). Having witnessed the way horses were trained (beating them when they did something “wrong”), Buck knew there was a different way. How this ties into the way he himself was raised is adds more heartbreaking depth to the film. I can’t really point to what film-making strategies make Buck one of the best films of the year, but all I know is it tells a powerful story and tells it well.
Linkin Park In the end US
(4x) (To BRIDGE)
HELLBENT by Cherie Priest
3. My mother taught me: TIME TRAVEL.
We had so many amazing entries for the 1st Challenge is was sooo hard to pick our favs. Hope you can pop on over to Fashionista and see the top 5 and vote for your fav. It super easy to do, we have a week for votes to be cast and we will be back with another exciting challenge and the results.
Verdict: Very good. More blue than green this morning. Very fresh tasting
Bill Bruford - drums, percussion
Okay. Take a deep breath and step back one step. A Scanner Darkly is the latest novel of Philip K. Dick’s that I have read in the last six months or so. Thus far: The Man in the High Castle 1962, The Simulacra 1964, The Three Stigmata of Palmer Eldritch 1965, Do Androids Dream of Electric Sheep 1968, UBIK 1969, A Maze of Death 1970, A Scanner Darkly 1977, Valis 1981, The Divine Invasion 1989, and The Transmigration of Timothy Archer 1982. I have read three volumes of stories. I am preparing to pick up The Exegesis again. Ten novels. A Scanner Darkly falls after the event that precipitates The Exegesis but before Valis, which begins the explication of said event. Perhaps I should consider it the darkness before the dawn.
Size: 14. Bust 36″, waist 27″
Oh yeah, there were other events in Brussels. As a matter of fact, in spite of the lack of heavy duty match ups, Brussels closed out the 2011 season with a BANG!
After their meal, Charles took her for a walk on the Embankment, where they admired the neon lights illuminating the buildings and shimmering on the water. As they walked over the bridge, he put a protective arm around her shoulder and asked “Will you go out with me?”
I added a slice of light provolone cheese some fresh cracked pepper and piled on the meat/peppers/onions! Both Sean and I enjoyed this so much! Plus hey if I wanted to eat this again I could always plan for it and fit in that higher point roll into my week! Gotta love Weight Watchers!
The group's aims will be primarily the promotion of the pub as a responsible, socially acceptable venue for alcohol to be sold. Highlighting the value of community pubs, and distancing itself from pubs not interested in the basics
Looks like a fab book!... and a wonderful gift! So... I met my soulmate at a bar! He likes to say he "picked me up". ha ha!!! The scandalous truth is... The night we met was suppose to be my wedding night but I called off my wedding only 3 nights before! My girlfriends dragged me out of my house crying to "go have some fun." Needless to say I was pretty grumpy and looked like crap (no make-up OR shower!) and my now hubby simply made me smile with the DUMBEST magic trick ever!!! Even at my darkest moment... I could see what a gem he was! So, I smiled, My girlfriends passed him my number, We married a year later... And we just celebrated our 16th anniversary with our 4 beautiful kids. sniff sniff.
Naman thought that he was the only person who walked out – but when he got to the lobby – he learned that was far from the case. Arrowhead’s entire yearbook staff followed his lead – including his 16-year-old sister.
For what a letter U can do
Don't think it's not happening — it is, in a shockingly large variety of ways, by a number of enemies, ranging from China to self-described "stateless statesman" George Soros, whose loyalty is to global socialism, not the U.S." --Investors Business Daily
Living across the country from family can be pretty hard, especially around the holidays. I don’t even know the last time we were able to be home in Washington for Thanksgiving. That’s life. Yet when my brother and his wife moved east over the summer, we were excited to be within driving distance (albeit a long drive) to family. Mike, Ashley, and the kids drove down to visit us for Thanksgiving and it was awesome. Thanksgiving 2011 was the best yet. Holidays with friends and neighbors are great, but nothing beats a house full of cousins!
We watched scary movies Wednesday night and while Paranormal Activity 3 had NOTHING to do with the first 2, despite being a prequel, we still squealed between bouts of 'HEY, that's NOT RIGHT!'. One effect was particularly good...
Review: I couldn’t wait to read this one, because it just looked so fun. And I have to say it was fun, and funny and witty and… I’ll stop there, but you get the picture.
I was deeply impressed by the finale, which moved me in ways I hadn’t expected. Doctor Who grew up a little and a childhood hero has managed to stay with me through the years.
The people watching this day was also pretty good. There were lots of kids throwing tantrums in different languages, which I thought sounded so funny. Clint made lots of funny comments about people we saw. He had me laughing all day.
With rivers of spit
“We don’t need a picture book about plastic surgery. My Beautiful Mommy is the new book written to prepare kids for that magical day when Mommy comes home from the doctor and they don’t recognize her. Which is when Mommy should explain to the kids that after giving birth to them and nursing them, her mommy parts needed a little sprucing up. And since it’s their fault, it’s coming out of their college fund.”
Blended families are not like you see on The Brady Bunch. They are forged from the fire of anger and the grit of determination. In the end, some are beautiful works of art and others are left on a pile of discards, charred and misshapen.
- Desert Survival*
Amount Requested $14,400
But it is Julie's latest find that has given me the most pleasure. Last weekend, I received a text message from Julie which read "I have found something at a fair that will make you squeal with delight".
What for them as capitalism drives the alien poor to this continent ,what for them as bricks are worth so very much and life so very little, what for them as the east grows fed by the pound and manufacturing here at home is now dead. My children, my children, I cannot offer them salvation cannot set them upon an easy path and I know that they to must toil for others, that they to must become embroiled with the complexities of unfairness and pay their due to sate mammon. I am coming to believe that if a nationalist movement is to contest that its primary objective must be the contestation of the money-powers that the poverty of the people must be purged and an individual’s labour gain the individual. Certainly the individual must pay for goods and services but they must gain him or her and indeed those they work to keep but never should one penny go towards the payment of thee great debt, a debt ever-growing, unfair in the extreme and the blight of nations.
So is there a way of branding that will foster a responsible attitude towards the property of others while yet remaining attractive, dynamic, unconventional and daring? Is there a way we can train consumers to keep their loyalty within manageable bounds? In short, can we use branding as a way of teaching respect for property, both physical and intellectual? And if these questions can be answered in the affirmative, who will take the risk of implementing such techniques in the volatile consumer markets of today?".
the fresh breeze
1/4 cup nutritional yeast
EGGLESS APPLE CAKE
Think you’ve run out of Father’s Day ideas because Dad has a room full of electronics? Here’s an idea: Turn them off! That’s right, shut them down, throw the kids in the car and take to the great outdoors! What good is a Father’s Day present that brings the whole world into your living room if you never get out and experience the real thing? Fishing gear gifts or camping gifts for Dad can be simple and economical, or you can buy enough camp gear for a crusade. (By the way, if Dad really isn’t the Lewis and Clark type, Mom might still get him to pitch a family tent in the backyard, if she buys a cozy double sleeping bag to go with it!)
And this school is, according to my former student, very successful in terms of pushing its students into top high schools and ivy league colleges. The only moment of doubt the owners or parent/clients have experienced is that the school’s grads find it very hard to express any opinion in either speech or writing. But I suppose that won’t matter once even the best colleges switch over to all multiple choice all the time.
“The Siskiyou County Sheriff’s Office has conducted a comprehensive follow-up investigation to assist Animal Control and the Siskiyou County District Attorney Kirk Andrus to successfully prosecute this case,” Sheriff Jon Lopey said in the release. “I am saddened by the senseless loss of these defenseless animals but I am confident that our investigation and the efforts of Animal Control will lead to felony criminal charges being filed against the suspects in this case.”
he glides past alleys and windows
Why is Adam’s sin so great? It was but the seizing of an apple! Was it such a great sin—to pluck an apple? “When the woman saw that the fruit of the tree was good for food and pleasing to the eye, and also desirable for gaining wisdom, she took some and ate it. She also gave some to her husband, who was with her, and he ate it.” Genesis 3:6.
Place peels, seeds or leaves (tear the leaves) in to jar. If you don't have enough to stuff the jar full, it can be added to over time. Pour vodka, moonshine or rum over them. The stronger the alcohol the better. Tightly screw on the lid, then set out of your way and out of your mind for a week, vigorously shake. Do this for four weeks. Strain and place into a separate jar. Do not open near a flame.
“A woman, thank goodness” I think.
The more I studied about project management for example or about Management of Human Resources, I look back and evaluated my experiences. I mean that there is a difference between the field experience and academics. Each one of us needs both to leverage his understanding to things and improve his intellect and performance…
Armed with a coke, I headed off to work which I have changed to the term Crazyville due to this week’s happenings. Did the day go perfectly????? No, but as I sit here tonight typing thinking about the day I realize overall it was a good day and what made it a good day was my friends.
I have to just say it and that is celebrities live their lives being bullied. They are stalked, harassed, slandered, pressured by their peers and are expected to live perfect lives. One step over the line and they are crucified. They have no rights and cannot even throw out the trash without people going through it. Society feels that not only are they expected to be perfect but when they do fail or something bad happens, everyone cannot wait to get their hands on the magazines, tabloids and other fodder. If you ask me, it’s a wonder they can keep their sanity as living under a microscope can be really hard. Sure, they have money but is it really worth all of this? Humans are not wired to exist like this and no wonder many spiral out of control.
Wine Glass Quantity Available: 60
I’m going to Iceland in the next few days. (My tax return made it possible for me to go and instead of trying to be Little Miss Perfect, I decided to do something fun for myself). Bon Iver’s Holocene and Neil Gaiman’s Stardust are to blame for my decision to go to Iceland. I plan on learning as much as I can about Vikings, how to pronounce Eyjafjallajökull properly and what sumardagurinn fyrsti is all about. But above all, I plan on taking this time away from the noise and rush of New York City to better learn how to appreciate myself despite my imperfections and without any ridiculous expectations of who I should or shouldn’t be. I will never be perfect, but I am strong, I am intelligent, I am creative, loving, caring, determined, diligent, funny and so much more. And I’m excited to get to know myself for me.
3. Always get the full story. It’s very hard to make a management plan if you don’t have the full history. If things don’t make sense, slow down or start over. This hearkens back to #1.
I really wanted chips. I rocked up, folded scooter under an arm, to face the chip giver. A pimply youth, who hated serving me chips. “Chips please…” I smiled. A grunt indicated a monetary exchange. Thus I waited. All I wanted was chips, but as I waited I remembered the girl I’d seen sitting out side. Her blank expression burned into my mind. I heard, “your chips…” then a hearty “Cheers!” escape my mouth; yet all I could think of was the gospel booklet in my pack.
Chinese Shao Shing Chiew (cooking wine, OPTIONAL), 1 table spoon
The job meant both photographer and agency work in Europe for many months on end, both in the studio and on location. It was big!
so she resigned herself to let her body
On the other hand, it resulted demonstrated that the dissemination of those materials (book and DVD) deepens the suffering of the two first Applicants and renders the search for the third Applicant more difficult (cfr. answer to article 92): each time the first Defendant’s thesis is newly divulged, the suffering of the first and second Applicants intensifies – whether through the existence or the announcement of a new edition of the book, or a new divulgation of the video or by the occurrence of interviews – mainly due to the repercussions that such events have on the search for the whereabouts of the third Applicant and due to potentiating the knowledge of said thesis by the fourth and the fifth Applicants.
liquor
There are no insoluble government problems.
1 T. lemon juice
Still in contention is GCB because it's owned by ABC.
I am in District 1, the kitchen. I am alone. Often, because I spend so much time by myself, I feel as if I am in control. In reality, President Mud (insert your child’s name here) is in charge. He lets me know he is the leader at every opportunity.
The following day new insulation will be installed by
I have exciting news to share with you today. I have been asked to be the Guest Designer for Word Art Wednesday for the month of May. I love to use Scripture on my cards and was so honored when they asked me to help out this month.
I can't wait to see how it turned out!!
He has a map that he claims leads to treasure buried somewhere in the depths of Iceworld, only lurking down in those depths is a dragon guarding the treasure. In the soda shop they also meet a young, headstrong waitress from Earth named Ace, who improbably claims to have accidentally “whipped up a timestorm” which brought her to this other world. As you might guess, Ace quickly becomes a rather important figure in the proceedings. Meanwhile, a creepy, soulless icy figure named Kane (Edward Peel) lurks on the periphery of the goings-on. He, too, wants the treasure called Dragonfire, and he’s been waiting 3,000 years to get it.
We can’t wait to receive your forged identification papers. We shall add them to our collection.
So what I have come to realize even more so after these two weeks is that I am content in Jesus because in all things he is enough.
The first time St. Pat's snuck up on me was back in two thousand and three. I was sleepily arriving at my day job, I was a web programmer back in those days, and expected another day of coding and testing, nothing more. The lamp posts were still lit in the dim, early morning light and nary could a noise be heard. It was just your average, monotonous, achingly boring Monday. Or so I thought.
And hey, what’s not to like about a naked prince. Well, not totally naked…but caught in his bloomers a couple of times.
I pulled the cover off of my bike and removed the battery tender – I won’t need that for about nine more months. I replaced the black leather saddle and tightened the nuts that hold it down - checked the oil and air, and then pushed her out onto our gravel driveway.
I think I’ve chattered on enough..lol..if you need proof of his awesomeness..just go and check out his blog..it’s wonderful!
Chelsea – Minnesota
She seemed quite happy doing this until I noticed that she’d moved all the toys into a little pile and was walking around them, face blank, just walking around. She didn’t respond to my voice but she did to a bear hug and a cuddle.
Doily Dies
Trouser Press did an excellent job documenting the band's history (read it here), which began in 1991 with early Superchunk drummer Chuck Garrison, Matt Walter, Mike Kenlan and Eric Bachmann, who not so long later rolled off to start the more gruff Archers of Loaf. The Trouser Press piece also explains the temporary Small 23 nameplate that confused the heck out of my then-14-year-old self.
I slept for a long, long time. It was nice. I got up and checked on the bunny. Out like a light. I decided to shower while I had the chance and even dried my hair. After all, we had a Christmas party to go to tonight.
I for one was very happy with the trailer, and I'd love to make sure that Lionsgate is well aware that there are plenty of big fans of the movie/trailer out there and that we would LOVE more Plum movies of Steph and the gang.
The dismissal of this appeal emphasizes the principle that decisions which are merely confirmatory of earlier unappealed decisions are not to be challenged by the General Court, unless there has been a material change in the facts leading up to the first and second decisions.
¼ t cayenne pepper
K) Micro finance and Bottom of the Pyramid schemes are maturing and appearing at scale in emerging markets. Models are also spreading back into mainstream institutions in some developed markets, for example Australia.
I am sure there are a lot people like me out there. These are folks who want to own a Motorcycle and also enjoy the luxury of riding, not speed demons that keep going “I love the speed” (trust me on Indian roads if you love speed you will only reach your death faster). A couple of things you should know in case you are Casual Biker – first get a bike that you are comfortable with and is low maintenance, just because the guy next door has an Enfield or Harley does not mean you have to get one. Trust me, from all the stories I have heard those bikes are planets where maintenance is concerned. Find people who have similar interests – more casual riders; you will be able to relate to them and they will speak to you about their rides in a language you understand. Trust me, I have spoken to people who talk like they are engineers and assemble bikes for a living (Good for them I say, but I understand things a little simple). Visit the local Chop Shop, you will definitely find something you will like to add to your bike; minor customizations on the bike are awesome, low risk and give you another reason to ride. I don’t know why, but the day we get our bike modified, the urge to ride is much more. Finally, keep a good mechanic’s number stored on your phone; you never know when you may need to use it. Find a route that you are comfortable with and ride there, learn the turns and bumps, trust me it is very different from driving a car.
Two weeks later, Nicole was at her desk at work when a co-worker came up to her and told her there was someone waiting for her in the lobby.
Jack Maxton Chevrolet will salute the nation’s active duty and retired service members in May by providing an exclusive “Honor” badge to customers who buy an eligible vehicle through the General Motors Military Discount program.
No, says Mann, they weren’t. The people Holmberg saw were the few survivors of an impressive and persistent culture that European contact destroyed, by disease and by design. What colonizers saw less than a century after conquest was not the world that the conquerors had discovered. It was the pathetic remnants of that lost world.
3) List at least 10 honest things about yourself
It was Mael Duin's:
During the construction, infrequent lane closures on Michigan Avenue may take place, but for the most part, traffic will proceed as usual.
-Cam
Day 2 my body reactions were still there except the fainting part, my muscles were still very achy, my headache still there and my stomach still hurt really bad. The hard thing was trying to figure out what I could take to relieve the pain but was still raw! I never did take any medications (which was hard)! I had fresh squeezed grapefruit juice, some coconut water and I had more solid food today, 2 bananas and 5 dates. By the end of the day I started to get rid of the achy muscles and my stomach started to calm down a bit.
Writer Beware often gets questions from writers in one country about agents in another. Mostly we hear from US writers who want to know about British agents, but we also hear from UK writers who are interested in querying American agents, and occasionally from Australian writers looking for agents in the US or the UK. Sometimes these writers feel they've exhausted agent possibilities in their own countries, and are looking for fresh options overseas. Sometimes they think that as long as the agent is interested in their market or genre, one agent is as good as another, no matter where in the world the agent is located.
28And they were with the disciples there for a long time.
-Homeowners who like open shelving, and have the eye and discipline to keep their dish collections looking neat and well put together at all times
Not cold as in Winter but cold as in Autumn ... when you still haven't gotten your warm clothes down from storage and all you are wearing is a Summer sweater .. when even your really cute and very comfortable boots don't keep your whole body warm, even though your toes are toasty...when you should beware of the brilliant sun which shines without any interference from any small wisp of a cloud and you are not wearing sunblock.
How often at work do we assume that we understand the parameters and then place rules and limitations on ourselves that aren’t really there?
So, together they started to roll the snowballs to make their snowman. As the afternoon wore on, they ended up making a snow family, a daddy with a top hat that Mr. Whitcombe found in his attic, a mommy with a shawl that he also brought out and a little girl and boy who each wore a knitted hat and scarf.
MY BRAIN IS A BIG FAT LIARHEAD.
What evidence do I have to prove that Michael Paymar is a covert Marxist?
“To hell with Dolly’s vagina!” I roared, pushing her out of my way. “You think I’ve got the time to worry about some old bag’s mangled fanny when the fucking news has got hold of the cannibal case? You’re over fifty! Don’t you even care about the all-you-can-eat buffet?”
Why not a couple large ones in the laundry room to hold
WILLIAM LEONG JEE KEEN is MP of Selayang. This article was written in collaboration with the Kajian Politik Untuk Perubahan (Political Studies for Change), a local research institute as well as a political think-tank.
3. Secure FTP – Plain FTP is not secure. The MFT solution must support both SFTP (FTP over SSH) and FTPS (FTP over SSL) protocols for secure FTP transfers.
I like to read about strong women. I like to write about strong women. Most of my personal heroes have been strong women, and that includes my mom. So this is a salute to all the moms out there, enjoy your day...enjoy every day, you deserve it!
Hispanics point out that in many instances the tax credit goes to workers who are not citizens but whose children are, because they were born in the country and have their own Social Security numbers. They say such children should reap the benefit of the tax credit just like other children in comparable economic circumstances.
The 2CV belongs to a short list of vehicles introduced in the middle of the 20th century that remained relevant and competitive for many decades, such as the Jeep, Land Rover Series, Fiat 500, Mini and Volkswagen Beetle.
Timothy Bottoms as Hank Poelker
the Blacks, Mexicans
I was feeling pretty bad about myself but then I realized something. It is not my fault at all. It is my phone's fault.
1. Illicit sex. Paul mentions three kinds of illicit sex: sexual immorality, impurity and debauchery. The first is a general term that encompasses all kinds of immoral sexual relationships. The next two terms refer to sexual perversions. The art and literature of Paul’s day provide ample evidence for the widespread practice of sexual immorality. When we read that “the sexual life of the Graeco-Roman world in NT times was a lawless chaos” (Barclay 1962:24), we only need to observe the chaos in our own world to understand the conditions in Paul’s day. In fact, a good case could be made that in the two millennia since the Roman Empire, our generation comes closer than any previous one to the blatant prevalence of sexual perversions that was characteristic then. And a study of the fall of the Roman Empire suggests that any society that tolerates the unchecked promotion of such perversions will inevitably fall apart from the rottenness within.
"There are seven birds in the consomme," Mrs Pig Flyin' says with a laugh. "We counted!"
“No one ever saw one quite like that, because that’s a very special sort of radio. In its day, circa 1935, its type was one of the most elegant consoles on the market. Now, with its fabric-covered speakers, its peculiar yellow dial, its serrated knobs, it looks quaint and a little strange. Mr. Ed Lindsay is going to find out how strange very soon, when he tunes in to the Twilight Zone.”
One of the exciting aspects of the film, not remarked by other critics, is the outstanding construction and excellently judged pacing which keeps the story moving briskly along. The furious activity of the daytime scenes, from the gathering of the wounded and the grisly operations, to the disposal of the corpses, is juxtaposed against relatively still evening scenes, preventing the mind from going numb from a surfeit of horror. The story of a nurse satisfying the sexual needs of amputees — with its extreme violence and lack of a comforting historical distance — was decidedly unlikely to appeal to audiences accustomed to the comparatively genteel films of Ozu and Imamura or the reassuringly familiar works of Kurosawa. Grim, horrifying, at times unrelentingly violent, Masumura’s Red Angel is also filled with some of the most agonizingly tender moments to be seen in any film.
Published: 1992
So of course I'm passing this on to my faithful bloggy friends! PLEASE go read about their journey and COMMENT ON HER BLOG... or if you feel your heart being tugged by God, make a donation of your own! God is doing another amazing work in this family's life and you can be part of it!
First up was Aberlour a'bunadh :- a 59.9% cask strength, straight from the cask Speyside rich, fruity beast. Of course it only takes a couple of drops to get the point across, so that's how things went down. I think this little addition worked really well. The powerful rich fruity flavours of the whisky melded really well with the big beer and made a great warming brew. It was now really woody and nutty, with hints of figs and a lot more vanilla now. Good match.
It will be wasted breath because most people, reasonably enough, want to see that there’s a life worth living on the other side of the changes your activist movement wants to make, and the best way to give them a glimpse of that life is to enact it yourself. It will also be wasted breath because most people have a tolerably good nose for hypocrisy, and are highly familiar with the kind of demagogy that calls on everybody else to make sacrifices and get by with less so the demagogue doesn’t have to do so. Talk to Americans who didn’t support either the climate change movement or its corporate opposition, and you’ll find that for a good many of them, it was when word of Al Gore’s air-conditioned mansion and frequent-flyer miles got around that they decided that global warming was yet another manufactured threat, meant to stampede people into acquiescing with somebody’s political agenda.
The health authorities are concerned about outbreaks of other types of skin and blood infections, as well as snake and spider bites as the cleanup operations begin, a health official expert said.
With no agenda for the afternoon in Cebu City, road trip buddy Ki and I decide to hop on a southbound Ceres bus. As is my wont, I get a shut-eye as the bus cruises out of the city. I open my eyes momentarily, barely catching a glimpse of the famous Carcar rotunda. Hours later, I fully awaken to the enchanting blue of Bohol Strait glistening in the sunlight. The bus is now tracing the coastline of Cebu Island. But we can see the end of the sunny afternoon further south. A compact column of clouds blurs the horizon. It is dumping rain on Bohol, the island next door.
Update: Hmm. I think this is true. I haven't had enough alone time to tell though.
For the second year in a row, Mary the Food Librarian made 30 bundts in 30 days. She likes big bundts, and she can not lie, y'all. In the same busy month, she also managed to turn out an amazing dessert buffet for her good friends' wedding with no fewer than 8 million types of sweets.
Continuing in my time-honored tradition of writing lengthy, dull essays about things I know practically nothing about, I wanted to ramble on for a while about my recent explorations of gendai haiku. A plea: even if you are not interested in my sketchy research, uninformed opinions, or pretentious literary analysis, you should at least skim down to read what are some pretty cool haiku. (By other people, needless to say.)
I really wished I would have seen this whole discussion so I knew the whole context, but to simply hint that women designers have less of an impact than male designers because they design for themselves just baffles me. We owe a lot to certain female designers for breaking barriers. We’d all be wearing dresses and skirts 24/7 if it weren’t for them.
Turning a corner out of the garage, the sharp wind turned on like a switch, immediately asking more of us in each step.
JOHN GLOVER (Love! Valour! Compassion!)
David Williams, the Australian rugby player.
I took them on. I lasted the full 30 days (thanks to my Dad who supported me and bought me soy milk and veggie burgers and everything else I needed to survive) - and then ate a steak on the 31st day and loved it! - so I know I can do this. I know I can. It'll just be interesting.
Staying in does not prevent renegotiation of the terms of membership, so option (iii) (if acted on by the government) merely adds a requirement to enter negotiations. What it cannot do is dictate the outcome of those negotiations because, by definition, negotiations only lead to a change if all parties to the discussion agree on a specific outcome. As I understand it an outcome in favour of option (iii) would not require the government to do anything, although it would be bad politics for them not to make at least a token gesture of trying to change the terms of EU membership. And even if they were constitutionally obliged to negotiate that would not guarantee any particular result.
“You’ve got to make the turntable smaller,” yelled Niko to Joe. “It’s a mini-turntable.”
Jane Doe calls.
So I have plenty of obstacles to work around to train effectively for this marathon but I think with determination and creativity I can do it. I will have to run on limited sleep at times (my children are horrible in this department), run when I don't want to if the weather conditions are not primo in my book, and also squeeze in runs on a treadmill that I would rather do outdoors. I work FT and juggle around Adam's demanding work schedule so sometimes I will have to juggle my running schedule I know but in order for me to see to the end of this goal I will just have to take it one run at a time!
If you were at the NOAA address, what were your thoughts?
High point: when a woman with a megaphone, at about 6k, said to the running multitude, “If you run a wee bit faster, you might win!”
The tour was short. Not in time, but in distance traveled. You move from the tasting room, over to the brewery room and listen to the tour guide talk about the history of Brooklyn Brewing Co, the building and their current state. All in all, it was about 30 feet. As someone who wants to open my own brewery I thought the tour was very cool, and yes they started as home brewers!!! At the start, they did contract brewing with F.X. Matt (Saranac) up in Utica, NY. To this day, the majority of there beer is still produced at the Matt Brewery. Only a few beers (Local 1, Local 2 and others) are actually brewed in the Brooklyn Brewery.
The photo above was taken while a gift quilt was on my couch in Ohio but I packed it up and sent it to my dear friend, a "mad English gardener" who happens to have moved to Scotland. She sold her home in England that had the loveliest perennial garden I had ever seen and I felt that she needed to have a beautiful garden that she could have with her forever. This quilt made from kit from Keepsake Quilting certainly "hit the spot" because her thank-you email arrived today and it was heartfelt and enthusiastic.
I am having all kinds of flashbacks about the things I tried to do to get
child, between two hearts melded together at first glance or of friendship. COLD
Add some wicker, blooms and vintage knick knacks and it was finished. I am happy with my new/old bathroom!
Invisibility
Anyway, on to the pictures.
The dark moon phase is also best for reversing spells (always be sure there is one there to begin with).
Feel the arms that reach out to hold me
But I am but a mere fool with foolish words so take from this whatever you want.
So ye, this one will definitely see some development over time. I want to print it rather large and with more details added to it, hopefully some even more intricate ones, as is you might have noticed the signatures mirrored on either side of the newsprint. Well think like that, and that’s kind of what I’m striving for.
I have NEVER been a simple scrapper
How about that, getting a chance to do what most of us only dream of doing! But the career of Frankie Zak was only beginning.
WOMAN - He's right. It's all here. Proper Job IPA, St Austell, award winning beer based on an original recipe, blah blah blah...
Science-fiction films, films of madness, amnesia, horror, dreams, drug-states, and time-travel, all these films have lead the way. They have given us the films that best capture the affective states relevant to our postmodern times. And yet, they so often seem to need to justify the structures whereby they produce these affects with tropes such as high-tech machines that allow time travel, or magical portals, or ‘it was just a dream’. These films have pushed the traditional plots to their breaking points, and yet, often feel the need to recapture what they have shown us within something that can reconnect with more traditional film-logics. But what if we made films that directly attempted to speak to the affects relevant to our age, without having to justify themselves via reasonings tied to the limitations of the ‘real world’? Or what if we at least gave ourselves the option?
"New?"
Mama and I missed this exhibit by like 3 days
“No, no,” she said, “the bugs that are in things like shit. The bacteria can get into your body and cause all sorts of ailments.”
The Fulani have been largely responsible for introducing and spreading Islam throughout much of western Africa. They have been a nomadic people and influential in regional politics, economics, and histories throughout western Africa for over a thousand years. The height of the Fulani empire was between the early 1800s and early 1900s, being consolidated under Usman dan Fodio and centered in northern Nigeria.
It Gets a Little Red by '68 Comeback
- 1 tablespoon (15 ml) Worcestershire sauce
Jun 13, 2011 2,911 Pageviews
Walk Away
Firestone Walker Reserve Porter
Quite suddenly, I had this picture of a girl who runs away for real. She meets up with a group of homeless kids and has to make a terrible decision. When I actually started writing, her boyfriend, Asher, came out of nowhere. He was dark and sexy and menacing, and it turns out he's intimately tied to her reasons for running away.
I have never been overly interested in facts and knowledge seems to slip through my mind as if my brain were made of teflon. I have difficulty researching - a terrible confession- mainly because I combine this urge to ask ‘what if’ with a terrifying lack of patience and real research takes time - a lot of time. I tend to read something fascinating and lose interest in the actual, sidetracked by the ‘possible, if wildly improbably,’ and indeed by the ‘probably impossible.’
Take care everyone and have a blessed afternoon.
Row 8: Ch 2, turn. *Fpdc in next dc, Bpdc in next dc. Repeat from * around. Do not join.
D' Amour Allure stamps include vintage styles to character art. Please browse the collections at our exclusive retailer, http://www.mcmahonfivedesign.com/
Well I have the minis I have picked up on the bench, but I also have downloaded all the scenarios from Barking Irons for the USE ME 001. I will be playing them out solo using the online tool Universal Battle. I am going to tweak Gavin's work a bit, and make it mostly Orcs fighting the human forces, as that is all I have for bad guys. I have the units in UB all ready, I just have to build the map boards. I know UB is a fantasy based system, but with the unit builder and a touch of imagination you can make all most any thing.
I'd like to write purely for adults in the future, but I've had a number of 'grown-ups' write to me to tell me how much they enjoyed Changeling. I think if you have a good enough story to tell it can appeal across a wide range of age groups.
Now, I believe I will go try and talk my co-worker (we are the only ones still at work) into getting an ice cream for half-price next door.
If you cannot attend the event,
Sebastian: I'm funny as hell? Just kidding! Because it's a kickass story about friendship, growth, you know... all the good stuff. Really though... I'm going to get all sappy, but because it's real..we're real, ya know? I hope we are at least. That's all i want. To be real and to tell a real story.
Saw your silhouette figure drift past me in my fright
It told me how the world works.
This lack of regard to the convention, coupled with the potentially retrogressive impact of these reforms, risks placing the UK in breach of its international obligations. This report is so timely. It sets out the risks to progress on independent living and makes sensible, achievable recommendations.
I slicked it on as soon as I bought it and was very impressed. The lipstick went on smoothly and didn’t dry my lips out. The colour wasn’t as pigmented as I had hoped, however it is a very wearable shade, with more than just a wash of colour. In the packagaing it looked quite a tangy orange, however on my lips it was more of a peachy, soft coral. It lasted a few hours, but I did have to reapply it a lot, which was a pain.
The Beatles began recording Paul McCartney’s “Eleanor Rigby” on April 20th, 1966. None of the Beatles played any instruments on the track, although McCartney, John Lennon and George Harrison contributed vocals. The song was eventually released on the album Revolver and as the b-side to the single “Yellow Submarine.”
unemployment rate in Lagos,
Day 17: Do you feel your child is watching over you?
But brokenness is deep in my heart. It is the unceasing reminder that I would be perishing if it were not for the miraculous fact that life springs from death.
Outside the car, saw a sign, said "Help this homeless widow"
That’s when I found out. So I broke up with him straight away. That was enough. I moved out a few weeks later. I could have done it sooner but I had to plan a big move abroad as me and Chris are not from the same country. He kept thinking I wasn’t going to leave so he never said anything. He cried when I told him I wanted to break up.
They transfer other peoples’ taxes to fellow Kleptocrats in the Third World under the guise of helping the starving or poor but make no effort to ensure that needy people get the aid.
Soft Rocks - Leave Your Earth Behind (Roots Unit's 'Goodbye Earth' Remix)
There's always next time, isn't there?
She lurched slightly as the train slowed. It broke in front of a dark station and the doors opened. She deflected her eyes from the platform as a lone man entered. He was dark and thin. His expression was slightly haunted, as though he had drifted into the car by accident. He blinked once as he looked up at the florescent light. The train began to move again, but he did not sit down. His black eyes scanned the car. He spotted her and for a brief moment a look of recognition seemed to cross his face, but it disappeared quickly. He chose a seat that faced her at the other end of the car from her, in a shadow. The train sped onwards.
It was my first flight to the USA since before 9/11 (unless you count looking across at the American Falls from the Canadian side of Niagara). It was a much edgier experience than I remembered. The restrictions had tightened again in the year since my last foreign jaunt in 2006. At check-in, my somewhat over-sized (listen who’s talking!) camera had to go into my suitcase, since I could only take one item of hand luggage, and I’d rather my camera was mislaid than my laptop. I had to tell the airline where I was staying, too. That was fortunate, as it happened. Opening the suitcase to put the camera away, I realized that I’d left my customary folder of travel information in my suitcase, and I was going to need it at the other end, for the immigration form.
and House 421 (A) Road, FHA
That’s when we noticed it was already 12:30. He called his mom and let her know he was spending the night. He laughed when she said she was thankful.
The bag is sort of water resistant, but after riding in the rain, it’s pretty clear that water is going to get into the bag from the zipper and all of the seams. (That nice map in the picture is going to turn into mush at the edges if it starts to rain.) The bag does come with a waterproof cover, but I have yet to use that.
Throw in the brandy to deglaze the pan, then add the stock, before topping up with red wine until the pan contents are covered.
LINE 2 cookie sheets with parchment paper
Isnt she just fabulous!!!, I chose to make a Twisted Easel card and wanted to keep it quite simple and funky to go with the quirky image. I coloured the image with promarkers and tried a little dotty background around the image to give it a bit of depth. The papers are from a MME Stella & Rose pad and I just love the colours and designs in this pad -so much I have nearly used it all up!!!. To finish I added a few rolled roses cut by Marrianne Designs Die and a fabby blingy Prima Swirl. The sentiment was a freebie from a magazine a couple of months ago.
My standard egg replacer is Yogurt.. Very easy to use and we are bound to get it right in the first attempt. My brother picked up Ener-G , the egg replacer powder.. from US.. Definitely my future try's will have them instead of yogurt!!!
The nose was rich and fragrant, dominated by plump plum fruit.
Anyways, I really should quit talking about how much time I waste watching TV and observing cats. I swear there’s more to me than that. I’m going to go get ready for my first day of work, ahhh! I get ridiculously nervous about first days. I am going to try not to gain any weight today at work, is that too much to hope for?
It crosses the lines that you can cross in historical fiction without even being questioned. But maybe looking at the horrors beneath our own feet, testing the cracks in the veneer of our civilisation, maybe that's a step too far. After all, it's a thin veneer, isn't it? Especially when you can see it.
Serving the families in Joplin made me realize that I want to serve as many people as possible and hear the stories of as many people as possible.
Round 14: Knit
" Private"
It’s a relationship that’s akin to covenant type thinking. In other words, I am yours and you are mine. I got your back and you got mine.
Joseph doesn’t reveal himself to his brothers, although he recognizes them immediately. For reasons which we can only guess, Joseph decides to test them. We often don’t have a clue what God has in mind when he’s allowing certain testing situations into our lives. But even though He usually doesn’t explain, we can be certain that His ultimate purpose is for our good, as Joseph’s was for his family. We get to see what’s going on in the minds of Joseph’s brothers…
The murder rate among Afrikaaner farmers has been estimated to be 310 per 100,000 people. A comparison of general homicide rates gives us an idea of how serious this problem is. The general homicide rate for the USA was 5.8 per 100,000 people in 2009. The general rate for South Africa has been 37.3 murders per 100,000 people in 2009. This means that the Afrikaner farmers ar being murdered at a rate that is 10 times the South African national average.
enormous Sudscrawler, which is parked beside a homestead
What precisely was the Nixon horror? Essentially, there was no such thing. Watergate was about President Nixon lying about when he learned about the Watergate burglary.
Maybe that's why they slip through my fingers
A Close Up
The holiday season is here, and I hope everyone had a wonderful Thanksgiving!! I definitely ate for two and had my fair share of turkey, dressing, casseroles and desserts! I enjoyed spending the long weekend with our families, and now I'm looking forward to sharing time with loved ones over the Christmas holidays. Yay!!
Hello again, and welcome, to my new friends,
'The daughter of a struggling greengrocer, Maisie Dobbs was only thirteen when she was sent to work as a maid for wealthy London aristocrats. But being bright and thoughtful beyond her years, Maisie studies her way to Cambridge, then serves as a nurse on the Front during the Great War. Now, years after Armistice, Masie has opened her own detective agency...'
01 Been To Heaven Been To Hell 04:35
Step 1 turn lights off when no one in the room; simple but effective.
1) If we could name three per second, it would take ten billion years to call them all by their names
What does a coffee shop, bed, a living room, a library and a garden have in common? No, it’s not a joke, it’s actually a list of possible answers to a question we often ask our guest bloggers. Where do you write?
These are not low-calorie and low-carb, but they are truly delicious and worth a splurge at a weekend brunch.
DON’T: Sit near to the stationary cupboard. This might be tempting because you will be able to see what people are taking but at the same time you will be asked where everything is without them looking for it first.
Leaving Canberra Airport.
And your friends keep calling, worried sick
I did really like this book, but probably more for the descriptions of places and smells, than for the mystery. There’s a lot of mystery in this book and it starts to build up from the first chapter. While that’s a huge part of the book, Rose excels in her descriptions — if there ever was a book that could be scratch and sniff, I wish it could be this one. The descriptions made me hungry to just climb inside the book and experience everything that was going on.
umbrella in my hand. Lying by the pool. :o)
50. Possession - A. S. Byatt
Every April in our town,
By night the skyscraper looms in the smoke and the stars
My intention wasn't to draw negative comparisons with "the other place", but Robert's observation raises important considerations. What is the interaction between institutions and structures and their effectiveness? I'm not a man for iron laws, and would cheerfully concede that there is nothing necessarily effective about a bicameral system, or ineffective about a unicameral parliament. Much, as always, depends on the virtues and capacities of individuals, but virtues are acquired, not innate, and can be shaped by institutions and their governing expectations. Lest anyone regards all this as suspiciously abstract, I'd wager that we'll shortly experience a parliamentary occasion in Holyrood which will vividly fill in the practical colour: the same-sex marriage Bill.
The last time I made a quiche from scratch was way back in I don’t know when at school. There are only a few things I actually remember making in food technology, egg salad (how adventurous that was!), pizza swirls which everyone made in Year 7 but were undoubtably extremely tasty and a rather novel way of using up left over pastry, and finally quiche. When I made it all those years ago I don’t think it turned out how it was meant to and it had to be remade. Oh well, for my first proper attempt since I was about 11 or 12, I have to say I’m rather impressed. It’s not often that a whole recipe works out how it’s meant to, I even managed to make the pastry myself! I’ve sampled a slice of each one (had to be done) and they’re both scrummy. The only downside to quiche is that it does seem to take a hell of a long time to make; it would have also been a lot cheaper to have just gone out and bought one – but where’s the fun in that!?!
Now for my "Improved aviation". Improved is a term that bloggers use to say that their version is some how better than original. As you know, I am much more modest than that. I need a term for this cocktail that is much more beholden to my family centered mid-western values. Something that takes me back to my childhood when people were just more down-home good.
Heterogeneous words are common (really, I don’t like to use the word "concept," although it is hard to avoid. It comes with a treacherous load of academic baggage. I'm thinking about the uses of the word; the nature of the “concept” is what is at stake, after all). We can understand the continuity of meaning between "That man's reservoir of good will" and "The city's reservoir of water" (the first use started as a simile of the second) but if we are thinking about what the word refers to the two uses are different enough that it makes most sense to say "'Reservoir' is a heterogeneous word," meaning that it is a word that can refer to multiple, distinguishable things.
2. Haas avocados or beefsteak tomatoes, .49/lb. at Sunflower (through 2/9/11)
Strategy #1 for this is to clear the decks (clear ALL the decks?) and Focus On Work. This may yet be what I decide/need to do.
Schlafly Yakima Wheat
I am standing there watching this out of the corner of my eye, trying to act cool. It’s not working. The bartender, a guy with many tattoos stares at my brother for what seemed to be 15 minutes without saying a word. He then leans over the bar and asks him:
t. pynchon's lot 49
My health story had been published on Christina Pirello's web site, Christina Cooks, but when I went to read it, the link was gone. Christina has redesigned her web site and I guess my story was deleted :) So I thought I would post my story here, updated, so it would at hand for when I need inspiration. I hope it inspires you as well!
Most of the main characters and I were hiding on the top floor of the abandoned apartment, the main character‘s friend & fellow police officer seemed to have moved on his own to another room, but he would come & give scouting reports & extra supplies; and he came to do that at this point in the dream.
--Carl Andrews (AY supporter)
In May 1975 he was convicted of robbery and sentenced to two years' imprisonment.
OG=1.061@70F
Lew Pulsipher has 3 pages on monsters from the Thomas Covenant the Unbeliever series for AD&D. I was always one of those people who stopped reading the book after the rape of Lena so I have no idea if these are on target or not. The monsters though look like they will work and there is quite a bit of them.
Roy: I mean the fellow’s name in goals.
Through the show Aamir has brought the issue in front of the public and has promised to write a letter to the Rajasthan Court, pleading them to constitute fast-track courts and the cases should be brought in the limelight and be resolved as soon as possible. Aamir, has also seeked public support which can be expressed via sms or feedback on their web portal www.satyamevjayate.in
could actually be counted.
2) Tonight, Western Conference Second Round: 4 Nashville Predators @ 3 Phoenix Coyotes, 8 pm/NBC Sports Network
BeerAdvocate describes it as an old ale, and I think that's right. Old ale is a comforting balm to cold weather, sporting burnished mellow notes. They aren't aggressive or flashy, but rather evoke that sense of agreeable mustiness. This stormy weather has been putting me in a wintry mood, and the old Vintage Ale was the perfect beer to address it.
Garson also appeared in other memorable films including “Pride and Prejudice” , “Mrs Miniver”, “Mrs Parkington” and “Marie Curie” .
8 Stang's Swang 2:50
Crust cooks up revolutionary, flatbread pizzas that are produced with natural ingredients. The menu here is far more ambitious than most with cocktails created with property-created vodka infusions, and starters like winter beet salad and Brussels sprouts with crispy bacon. The Carbonara pie with bacon, egg, and caramelized onions, and the unique produced with braised beef brisket, pepper jack cheese, and barbecue sauce are true standouts.
When you see me passing
It’s no big deal, I don’t care
Now Cheney, who was part of a fairly despised administration, it running around the country holding himself as the spokesperson for a humiliated political organization demanding we send more troops to Afghanistan. He has criticized the current administration as timid. Personally I think Obama's evaluation process is sound. Why would we want to put one more American life at stake when we have no assurances the political governance of the country we are fighting in will be stable going forward, is even is today.
My daughter very generously sent me a big box of chocolates from Animal Aid and there was a creme egg in there with the package. After a few seconds to get over the excitement I bit the top off and devoured it there and then in a full frenzied chocoholic maniacal episode.
The news of Hex's death hits the papers and eventually Mei Ling learns of his death. Sadly for Mei Ling, even though she no longer is with Jonah Hex, the town busybodies still impose their bigoted views upon her and Jason.
Before we rest in slow motion slumber
EastEnders: Scott Maslen (Jack Branning) - WINNER
Model Makers Will Just Love This 10×20 Midi Lathe
I am still angry at myself for missing Gomorra at the Chicago International Film Festival.
But take us outa dea, so da Bad Guy no can hurt us.
Annnnd here I sit… staring at the screen and wondering and then it hits me. I’ll write about the one thing that every one of us faces, every time we sit down at the computer or at the desk with pen in hand.
To quote from Lucas in the Huffington Post,
Anyhow, upon discovering that today is World Book Day, I hit Google to see what I was missing. Not much it seems. I discovered, for example, that the Department of Education in Western Australia thought that March 1* was World Book Day. Hmm … yes it was, but in the United Kingdom. Several others thought the same. The English, it seems, are doing such a great job of promoting their celebration of World Book Day that they have confused we Antipodeans!
~ Kenna
Note to celebrities: Make sure you copyright your Chinese names before it’s too late. Michael Jordan is suing a Chinese sportswear company for using his name and identity without his permission.
I'm a pool girl.
SaaS, or software as a service, involves Robert not only supplying the equipment but also that which needs the equipment to operate: from planting our spring purchases from the garden centre through to spending extra time working on the rose bushes or removing a less-than-healthy bit of shubbery. SaaS is a very broad market and is probably today’s most common. Salesforce.com, Google Apps and Microsoft Office 365 are all examples.
Help us raise money for the Severn Hospice by donating your old or gently used books (please don’t bring heavily damaged books as we’ll not be able to sell them) and we’ll sell them at the Jubilee Event in Lightmoor and pass the money raised to The Severn Hospice. Everyone benefits when you donate used books to charity.
Morello: I told you to stop freaking out at work.
GINGRICH: I think, of the four of us, yes.
And Redford obliged.
If you already follow me, THANK YOU.
The latest issue of RubberStampMadness is now out an available for sale at Viva Las Vegastamps! Be sure to order your issue!!! A lot of Viva Las Vegastamps! are featured in this issue!
As your children get older, you are still there to tell them of the fascinating things you discover, and to hear what they are fascinated by.
Want to win this set? All you need to do is leave some love in the form of a comment on the blogs below! Why? You need to try to figure out…..
Lorraine - Fairly Girly
I crave you all over again
In my book, the characters don’t trade houses. They swap suitcases—by accident. These are the two teenage characters who then begin flirting online while purportedly trying to track down their missing luggage in Paris (the 18-year-old girl) and Madrid (the 17-year-old boy).
April 7– Monday– London, England– Sydney Nelson, composer, dies at age 62. He has claimed that he wrote more than 800 pieces of music.
I love my compound. I love the fact that my daughters can use the swimming pool and the gym which has women only hours. I love the fact that my kids can play outside in a gated community without me having to continuously check out their whereabouts.
Awesomeness factor 2 came from the whole 'summer school' concept. The cape cod institute is thirty two years old and provides summer classes for mental health & OD professionals at the Nauset high school in cape cod. As a grown up it's really cool to step back in time to high school (actually my UK version was called secondary school) but the concepts are similar, classrooms, common areas, dodgy loo's and plenty of space to saunter round trying to look cool! What REALLY surprised me is how insular some of my fellow students were. I get that an 11-18 year old may be 'too cool' to engage with others, but really 45 year olds??? Perhaps I'm too intimidating or expect too much but I could have used a bit more engagement people!!!
The cover was smooth and clean.
Mr Young is off to Germany on a business trip. I wouldn’t say I have an obsessive personality, yet whenever any of us is travelling anywhere – particularly abroad – I suffer from a Tourettes-style trait which means I have to bellow “Tickets? Passport? Phone? Money?” every fifteen minutes at the relevant traveller (even if it’s myself, so the bellowing can also be directed at my mirror image).
So, recently my ex boyfriend and I got into a nasty fight which had me feeling lonely and blue. It was the week of my paid vacation I earned from work, and I didn’t want the fight to ruin my opportunity to relax and enjoy life. So, I decided to take a road trip. Where? I wasn’t quite sure, however I knew I wanted to go somewhere warm. I had researched for days, looking up best vacation spots on the east coast, east coast road trips, and most lively beaches (similar to Miami Beach but nicer). Then, on a Tuesday morning, I woke up, packed a few things, and began my road trip down south. I knew I wanted to go to Florida, but I wasn’t decided on the location quite yet. Driving on I-95, I was privileged to enjoy 65 degree sunny weather with towering full trees on either side of me. After 12 hours of driving, I made it to Daytona Beach, FL, where I had to stop and take a break. At my resting point, I continued to research where my final destination would be. I was debating Clearwater Beach, Boca Raton, or Las Olas Fort Lauderdale. I didn’t decide until I left in the morning and, well, I eventually chose, Las Olas, Fort Lauderdale.
I know you are green with envy.
It was Kriss' fatal bad luck that he innocently crossed the path of racially motivated Asian killers Daanish Zahid, Imran Shahid, Zeeshan Shahid, Mohammed Mustaq, and their accomplice Zahid Mohammed (who later told the court that, seeing revenge for some earlier slight by a white person, the gang of thugs drove around the area looking for anyone young and white in order to "chop them up and take their eyes out and stab them"). Kriss was out walking with his friend Jamie Wallace, when a group of Asians leapt out of a Mercedes, attacked them both, dragged Kris into the car, and drove off. As Jamie escaped, he heard one the kidnappers say. "You'll be next".
When he cheats … it doesn’t have to be the worst thing in the world.
Live life to the full.
With all of these responses from varied fields of Christian Biblical defenders, there is no doubt that Christianity can hold up against charges from any front. All of these books are helpful in their own way and there are many more that provide solid answers to the bold claims of atheists. Whether atheism is actually making a measured comeback or not is an issue that will have to be addressed in the years to come. For now, there is no doubt that many Christians have heard the boisterous claims of the New Atheists and have themselves been asking questions about their own faith and the Bible. For the Christian who may not be able to determine where to begin in their quest to chew through some of the above-mentioned books, the task can feel daunting. There is so much to read and so much material and information to process that it can be easy to take the fideist approach and just believe in God anyways. In step McDowell and Morrow. Amidst all of the beneficial books that are both readable and highly technical, McDowell and Morrow have taken eighteen of the most hotly debated issues among Christians and Atheists. With remarkable ability, they have condensed these eighteen issues in an easy to understand way without being overly simplistic. They have brought out the salient points of contention within each issue and have responded with clarity and forthrightness. No chapter is longer than 15-16 pages and some are as short as 9-10.
There is no grace in their relationship with God,
I miss you thanks for the time you lend
Solar has a big future. IEA predicts 22% solar by 2050.
As Article 11bis(3) of Berne expressly states that it is a matter for legislation in the countries of the Berne Union to determine the regulations for ephemeral recordings made by a broadcasting organisation by means of its own facilities and used for its own broadcasts, by adopting a specific exception for ephemeral recordings in the InfoSoc Directive, the EU exercised the competence previously devolved on the
My first year of teaching behind me! Changing career paths after the bubble of having kids was a major move and this first year of full time teaching - and teaching subjects I knew very little about initially was CHALLENGING, would never in a million years have guessed I would get to know so much about Mediterranean history and more specifically Maltese history!
If someone hurts your sister and you're any kind of man, you seek revenge. If your brother's accused of a terrible crime but says he didn't do it, you defend him. When Mikey's sister claims a boy assaulted her, his world begins to fall apart. When Ellie's brother is charged with the offense, her world begins to unravel. When Mikey and Ellie meet, two worlds collide. I found the setting and language of You Against Me really interesting and unique, even if I didn't totally connect with them. It takes place in England, but not in the transplanted American way that many YA books do, but instead filled with authentic slang and settings that were neat to read about. You Against Me also tackles some important and interesting issues, and it's compelling that way, but for me it was more of an intellectual interest than an emotional one. Mikey, despite the terrible nickname, is an incredibly strong and powerful main character, and I enjoyed his storyline more than Ellie's. I really felt like he underwent some genuine growth throughout the novel, and it's rare to read a story where a character's evolution is so dramatic, and yet still realistic.
There have been cool lines throughout it though:
1. High Fantasy
Divide and conquer
When asked about this revelation, compromised Canadian Army Intel officer Eva Wood said, “It’s kinds sexy, I mean, uh, I mean, yeah, all werewolf clones get off on watching bi-guys in bowlgerdahiness!”
That same song has been playing far too long
Law is responsibility. To riot is to proclaim that the law does not apply to you. That you are beyond, below and above the law. It is a rejection of ownership for individual behavior and the larger society. That attitude can be seen in an administration which conspicuously loots and wastes money because it does not think of the money or the country as belonging to it. It can be seen in the street level rioters for the same reason.
Here is what I did:
But as I've still got some of the faded puffs I made a collection of them, chosing those which I can't use in my projects (either because of the colour, or because they are too frayed for me). In the end there were about 160 genuine 1920's Suffolk Puffs which I would now like to sell to a good home for a special price! Please take a look at the photos and let me know if you're interested.
The authors “express these freedoms in a way that subsequent users can use and rely upon without the need to hire a lawyer,” (Lessig, 2004, p. 283) in the case of copyright infringement. There are people who want to publish their works in an open manner, in a public domain, in which other people can freely use the author’s work (while giving credit) to create something new. “It does this by making it easy for people to build upon other people’s work, by making it simple for creators to express the freedom for others to take and build upon their work,” (Lessig, 2004, p. 282). If an author allows the freedom for others to use his or her video or music to create something new, then it is not illegal for the user to do so and post it online—as long as proper credit is given to the original author. If the credit is not given, then the user is violating the Creative Commons license as well as copyright law.
So what’s the proper price for this place? I have no idea. There are still billionaires around and what’s $25 million to them? Lesser folks might blanch at that price but somewhere there’s a value here, whether that’s at $12.5, $15 million or full price I’ll leave to the rich folks. But a grand house, all in all.
That is some seriously effective, low budget advertising, especially in the hard-to-stay-alive-let-alone-compete restaurant category.
Did Gretchen get married? (thanks to the anonymous tipster.) I'm sure we would have heard about it if she had, but I can't find a thing.
:: On average I manage about 10 pages of What to Expect When You're Expecting by Heidi Murkoff before I have to throw up from 'Jeez, does she think I've never ever seen a baby before in my life?', 'Oh Lord, how cutesy-wutesy is just too fucking cute', 'Not. Ever. Doing. That. Ever.' or 'You do understand that we didn't just recently upgrade the operation from storks to vaginas, right?'
After that, I took the kids out for lunch to treat them because they'd been so good all morning. We went to Ihop. When the food arrived, Austin cut up Brooklyn's pancake for her and I cut up Clay's. I didn't even have to ask Austin. He just did it. The kids were really awesome there; they ate their lunches; used good manners; and thanked me for taking them.
Great leaders learn to be bold, but they are not bullies.
Q: Why are you making so many mistakes reading to me? Didn’t you write this book?
The only lawyer hit with a lifetime ban by the SEC for his work on behalf of a client is Steven Altman of New York. The client was a witness in an SEC investigation, and the agency alleged that Mr. Altman suggested in a recorded phone conversation that the client’s recollection of certain events might “fade” if she got a year of severance pay.
Well, the big wide world of blogs didn’t crush me, and I didn’t get a large response to my initial post. As can be seen, there is one comment by Jennifer Jones. Jennifer, you have my thanks. I extend again my thanks to Jay who blogs at Thunder Bay Trees and Jarret who blogs at Northern Boy. Both of whom have been an unyielding resource to my unyielding (and neophyte) questions. Shortly after I put up my first post I sent the link to Jay and asked him “now what?” Well his response were many and trickled in throughout the day. I, in all honesty, had no clue what on earth (or should I say, “what in the blogosphere”) I was going to go on about next. Mostly because I did not know what to do next. I made the blog, I wrote my first post, and a few people were gracious enough to read it. But, lets face it, the majority of people who read my first blog are people that I personally know. So, besides enlightening my immediate circle on my opinions and doings, what is the purpose of my blog? How do I expand my readership? How does anyone find me? Well I think I’ve narrowed it down to two categories. Two things in my opinion drive a blog.
Obama will now have to defend his PRO-DEATH (abortion) policy before the Kangaroo (supreme) Court.
The seekers came to be game changers.
We (Indians) have excelled in so many non- physical fields like science, computer, art and so on but we have a long way to go when it comes to social advancement. To top it, we were the ones who created Kamasutra but what went wrong in between?
And so: blood.
Crumbs
I know; it's been a few days....and I FINALLY have the time tonight to sit down and gather my thoughts. (And there are so many! The Man's consulting a urologist to consider the snippage! Holiday-Anticipating Fun-n-Hijinx! Six days and counting until my dreaded, fucking, 38th birthday!) However, I just don't think I have it in me tonight.
Obama seeing nothing wrong with a person who needs government help at every stage of their life.
itted to maintain communal peace and harmony. We also consider it our duty to protect the minorities and provide for their special needs. This is why we have started many new programmes in the last four years for the welfare of our brothers and sisters belonging to the minority communities. These include scholarships for minority students and special programmes for the development of districts which have a high concentration of minorities. These schemes have shown good results. We will vigorously take this work forward. We have been giving special attention to education and health in the last six years. Improvement in these two areas is an important component of our strategy for inclusive growth. It is also necessary for higher economic growth in the years to come. After independence, these two areas could not get the importance they deserved. We tried to change this state of affairs in the 11th Plan. Today, almost every child in our country has access to primary education. Now, we need to pay more attention to secondary and higher education. We also need to improve the quality of education at all levels. It is our endeavour that every child, irrespective of whether he is rich or poor and which section of the society he belongs to, should be given an education that enables him to realize his potential and makes him a responsible citizen of our country. We will continue to implement the new schemes that we have started in the last six years in the areas of education and health with sincerity and hard work and in partnership with the State Governments. We will soon bring a Bill to Parliament for constitution of two separate councils in higher education and health respectively so that reforms in these two areas can be accelerated. Nutritious food and good health services are necessary but not enough for ensuring good health of our citizens. We also need cleanliness and good sanitation in our villages, towns and cities. There are many diseases which would be difficult to prevent otherwise. The truth is that our country lags behind in this area. I consider it a primary responsibility of all our citizens to maintain cleanliness and hygiene around them. I would like our children to be taught the importance of cleanliness and hygiene in schools from the very beginning under a campaign for a Clean India. I appeal to the State Governments, Panchayat Raj Institutions, civil society groups and common citizens to make this campaign successful. Mahatma Gandhi had said that our earth has enough for everyone’s need but not for everyone’s greed. Imprudent use of the earth’s natural resources has resulted in the problem of climate change. We need to use our natural resources with care and prudence. It is our responsibility towards the coming generations to protect and preserve our forests, rivers and mountains. Our government will endeavour to take care of environmental concerns in our projects for economic development. There is a large deficit in our physical infrastructure which affects our economic development adversely. There is a shortfall in the supply of electricity to industries. Our roads, ports and airports are not of world standards. We have been trying to increase electricity production and improve our roads, ports and airports. The resources required to create good physical infrastructure are difficult for the Government alone to mobilize. Therefore, we have endeavoured to involve the private sector in our efforts. The steps that we have taken after 2004 to improve our physical infrastructure have started bearing fruit now. About one and half a months back, I dedicated a new terminal of the Delhi airport to the nation. This is an excellent terminal which has been completed in record time. We will continue to make such efforts to improve our physical infrastructure. There has been much discussion recently on the issue of internal security. If law and order in any part of India deteriorates or peace and harmony gets disturbed, the common man is adversely affected. Therefore, it is one of the primary responsibilities of any government to maintain law and order so that the citizens can live and earn their livelihood in an atmosphere of peace and harmony. Naxalism is a serious challenge to our internal security. I pay tribute to the men and officers of our security forces who have became martyrs in the attacks by naxalites in the last few months. I have stated this before and I say it again – our Government will fully discharge its responsibility to protect each and every citizen of our country. We will deal firmly with those who resort to violence. We will provide all possible help to State Governments to maintain the rule of law in areas affected by naxalism. I once again appeal to naxalites to abjure violence, come for talks with the Government and join hands with us to accelerate social and economic development. A few days back I took a meeting with the Chief Ministers of States affected by naxalism. We will fully implement the consensus that emerged in that meeting. I would like to repeat here a point that I made in that meeting. It is imperative that Centre and States work together to meet the challenge of naxalism. It would be very difficult for any State to tackle this problem without cooperation from the Centre and coordination between States. We all need to rise above our personal and political interests to meet this challenge. As I have stated earlier, most naxalite affected areas lag behind in development. Many such areas also have a large concentration of our adivasi brothers and sisters. We want to end the neglect of these areas. I have asked the Planning Commission to formulate a comprehensive scheme towards this end, which we would implement fully. It is also our endeavour that our adivasi brothers and sisters join the mainstream of development. They have been dependent on forest produce for centuries and this dependence should not end without the creation of new sources of livelihood. Apart from adequate compensation for land which is acquired from them, we should also ensure that our adivasi brothers and sisters have a stake in the developmental project being undertaken. I would like to state one more thing in this context. It is very necessary to make the administrative machinery more sensitive in areas affected by naxalism. The government officials who work there should not only be sincere but should also be alive to the special needs of our adivasi brothers and sisters. It is my hope that the State Governments will pay adequate attention to these requirements. We have a special responsibility towards the States of the North East. We are trying to live up to that responsibility. The North Eastern part of our country has been witness to some unpleasant incidents in the recent months. I would like to convey to all political parties and groups of the North East that disputes in the name of State or tribe can only harm all of us. Discussion and dialogue are the only options to resolve complex issues. As far as the Central Government is concerned, we are ready to take forward every process of talks which could lead to progress in resolution of problems. In Jammu and Kashmir, we are ready to talk to every person or group which abjures violence. Kashmir is an integral part of India. Within this framework, we are ready to move forward in any talks which would increase the partnership of the common man in governance and also enhance their welfare. Recently, some young men have lost their lives in violence in Jammu and Kashmir. We deeply regret this. The years of violence should now end. Such violence would not benefit anyone. I believe that India’s democracy has the generosity and flexibility to be able to address the concerns of any area or group in the country. I recently participated in a meeting with political parties from Jammu and Kashmir. We will endeavour to take this process forward. I would like to convey to our countrymen, especially our citizens in Jammu and Kashmir and in the North East, that they should adopt democratic means to join hands with us for their and country’s welfare. We want prosperity, peace and harmony in
Excellent question, we're glad you ask. There's this little man, knowledgeable in what is good or bad writing. He's also a very fast reader. No, seriously. Your Memeoirs is made by selectively publishing the e-mails from your contacts that fall into the time frame you choose. That said, newsletters, account activation e-mails, and all that non-personal mailing will be discarded for you. Also, we try our best to purge the body of the e-mails of redundant content.
Forces running on the top of a pyramidal cone
I survived. 21.2 miles SOLO. Nina Machina has the Colorado Marathon next weekend so she was tapering like a good little girl and the other ladies were running much less this week so it was just me. I did map my run and thought I had 22 mapped out but I was at 20.7 at the trail outside my back door so I decided to take the long way around but I couldn’t mentally bring myself to run past my door just to add .8 miles so 21.2 it was!!
Jolly Pumpkin Oro de Calabaza: a beautiful, complex Belgian strong ale. Lots of barnyard and Brett yeast notes.
"Particulars about the position of Pattisons (Limited), whisky distillers and blenders and brewers, in Leith and Edinburgh, are difficult to obtain in London in a trustworthy form, but there can be little doubt that the alleged difficulties of the Company are partly attributable to a cause affecting the whole whisky trade. The Report of the Commissioners of Inland Revenue for the year closed March 31 last disclosed a stock of whisky in the hands of distillers and factors amounting to about 137,677,000 gallons, and since March the total must have sensibly increased, thanks to the excessive competition of producers without regard to consumption. In six years, the rapid increase in consumption notwithstanding, the stocks in bond have expanded fully 32,000,000 gallons. Production must be curtailed until excessive stocks have been drunk up."
The breakout hit feature Flapper Fanny by Ethel Hays spawned quite a parade of pale imitators. By the late 1920s, any newspaper that didn't yet have a dim-witted young beauty making daily commentary was strictly behind the curve.
Holly Black and Cassandra Clare have teamed up to write a 5 book middle grade series! The Iron Trial comes out in 2014, which seems a long way away...
I haven't blogged in a few days because things have been really busy at school... lots of changes as well as report cards, plans... you all know how it is!
I am a co-founder of Health Travel Guides, Health Travel Technologies and Health Travel Foundation. We are globalizing health care, removing the borders and barriers to the most innovative medical practitioners, technology and procedures in the world.
Dalek Beach Party - Teddy Boys Picnic 2:13
I'll be posting the Strawberry Vodka Jam recipe which Stef and I made last week. All credit goes to her, the Empress Dowager of jammy goodness.
More and more people nowadays are looking for alternative ways to earn more income. Having one day job seems to be not enough to sustain an average household anymore. Because of the ongoing recession that the whole country is experiencing, everyone has been trying out their luck in different industries to bring in more earnings.
But he's probably best known for hanging by his feet from a rope in the middle of the woods as a throat target for some mad slasher with a machete.
R4- with dk brwn, sc in each (9)
But here's the best part; there's always next year. If you're under eighteen, come and be a camper and you'll have the most joyful time of your young life. If you're over eighteen, don't sweat it. Come be a staffer - they have almost as much fun as we do. But even if you can't make it, we're always sending our best wishes to you, and hoping you get at least a little piece of the energy and experiences we get every single year.
Where only time can find it
Can you just imagine what a parrot would say at my house?
For this card, I revisited the sets called
they were the same limitations that I'd already previously rejected. In that
So it’s Monday again. The Tired was trying to take me down today, but I had a smallish victory over it and managed a 2.6 mile run after school today. Last week I said that Mondays were going to be about music around here, and I intend to keep to that, but it is my blog and I’ll do what I want to, so I’d like to ramble for a paragraph or so. Mostly about “The Tired.” As soon as I sit down it tries to take me out. Busy has been the definition of my life these past few weeks and I can feel the burn out coming. I need to be better about purposefully scheduling down time for myself. Today I had a whole hour where I did nothing but read my blogs and look at fb. It was exactly what I needed mid-day to give my brain and body a rest. Constantly thinking about my lists and responsibilities is stressful to me and some zone-out time is about the only thing that helps my brain relax.
i mean you don't stop
Don’t believe it when they tell you there’s nothing to do in Surabaya. There’s at least four, yes, FOUR things to do in Surabaya with the kids other than the malls. I know, it doesn’t sound like much but at least despite our 2 week-long trip we managed to entertain the boys and I didn’t die trying to come up with a new version of twinkle-twinkle little star. The rap version was hard enough.
because your turn has come to share, grow or learn.
Hopefully, this week, I will take down my snowman tree in here. Need the space!!!! Already working on some tulips, bunnies. Started painting tonight..egg outfits for the Welcome seasonal bear that I do. I'm sold out of pink and purple so better get some made up for a show in March.
Severian's encounter with the two-head Typhon about two-thirds of the way into the novel serves to illustrate a related concept: that of the loss of freedom and the chimera of dominion. Typhon, former ruler of Urth and apparently other world chiliads (or thousands) of years before Severian's time, has been revived somehow by the power of the Claw (Typhon shall also be discussed later outside the New Sun series). He exists as he does due to his appropriation of the slave Piaton's body. This is but the first of many signs in the two short chapters that Typhon appears of the insidiousness of power and its corrupting influence on those who desire to wield it. Typhon, playing the role of the New Testament Satan, tempts Severian with the offer of control of Nessus in exchange for swearing allegiance to him. Severian, although sorely tempted, resists and literally casts out Typhon from the mountain top where the two had their confrontation. Although the religious parallels are obvious and do serve to reinforce many of the religious symbols presented in the earlier book, it is the notion of freedom as opposed to dominion that is central to this scene, as we shall soon see when Severian encounters two other people in his travels after this volume.
Alas I am fully occupied with training a couple of colleagues, in fact the remote workers, oh the irony, and working on my French course so no time to chat about my favourite flowers, nor my sadness about being unable to be in France for May 1st as planned
A government spokesperson explained the dangers:
“I need a Twitter and Facebook strategy. And please make a list of your internal social media contacts because that’s a good group to communicate with. Just write up what you guys have been up to. Quick turnaround, please, I need this tomorrow morning.”
~ Most people will tell you they would love to do that but........(insert several reasons from they work, to their kids drive them crazy enough in the holidays)
Even if deciding to remake the movie Fame calls into question their devotion to that principle. After visiting a brothel that catered to, umm, specialized tastes, Voltaire famously observed that "Once is philosophy, twice is perversion." Well, sometimes even once isn't philosophy. Or Art.
1/4 cup / 50g granulated sugar
You can keep going from here. This is a tea that will no doubt deliver 6, 7, 8 or even more flavorful steepings. It’s also a great tea to grab a cup of after a tough day out in the yard taming the overgrown plantings that are taking over.
it's funny that the concept only got a couple sentences in dr. sears' book yet is the subject i'd end up being most intrigued by.
Bates Motel
Why get involved in a citizen science project?
THANK YOU everyone who hosted me and took me places and shared your lives and towns and made the adventure so big and memorable. Thanks to those who read the blog and cheered me on in my Quest to Document. :-)
Annamaria Zanella
The single caution that I might raise regarding Holiday Cheer is that it is not a beer for getting drunk on. As is common with many more flavorful but low alcohol content beers, the intriguing flavor that draws you in is also the element that makes you feel bad if you drink too many. Consider yourself warned, friends.
Never camp along streams or in washes. Many flash flood deaths in Utah are due to people camping in these areas when a flash flood occurs.
Discs four to six contain the same tape used for Azimuth Coordinator. Four songs, “Raving And Drooling,” “You Gotta Be Crazy,” “Have A Cigar” and “Echoes” appear on Vancouver 1975 (SACEM 091-013). It is more distant than the first and has some hiss present, but there is also more emphasis upon the lower frequencies than the first tape. “Shine On You Crazy Diamond Parts 6-9? has the last few notes cut off in the recording.
For sole traders though, what really matters is safeguarding assets and properties.
Following on from the book I shared last book is another linen book by Yoriko Sakurama. So many more wonderfully styled and photographed images of knit and crochet inspiration! I have yet to make anything from this book but I think first off my list would be that lovely knitted snood, it looks so cozy. I think I would probably choose a wool instead of a linen if I was to make it but stick to a neutral colour.
They’re not saying they definitely should have been selected, said their Washington-based lawyer, Cyrus Mehri, only that they be given “the same level of consideration as white applicants.”
1. Interpret – Ambiguity is unsettling. Faced with it, the leader is tempted to reach for a fast (and potentially wrong-headed) solution. A strategic leaders holds steady, synthesizing information from many sources before developing a viewpoint.
And I lost my breath?
—Climate Wars: The Fight for Survival as the World Overheats by Gwynne Dyer (Oneworld Publications). Dyer writes that his awareness of climate change was kicked off by two things: "One was the realization that the first and most important impact of climate change on human civilization will be an acute and permanent crisis of food supply." The other "was a dawning awareness that, in a number of the great powers, climate-change scenarios are already playing a large and increasing role in the military planning process." Putting two and two together, Dyer has hypothesized, based on a close reading of military documents outlining climate-change contingency plans, what he calls climate wars: wars over food, water, territory, and unrealistic lifestyle guarantees.
Our Norwegian correspondent added this afterword:
It’d also allow me to not have an interview at McDonalds on Thursday, but ah well. Well done, Roy, you beat me.
They will knock your socks off with their mad design skills, and delight you with their wonderful personalities.
It was a beautiful day here today so Kevin and I took advantage of the nice weather and headed downtown. We did a little shopping and had lunch outside. In November. In Massachusetts. It was amazing.
To go up to the top of the arch you get a timed ticket. Then you wait for one of the small “pod” elevators. If you are afraid of small spaces or heights, you’ll want to skip this. The pods have a small doorway and you’ll feel like you are entering a space pod! They seat 5, but 2 adults & 3 kids felt perfect – I can’t imagine being in there with 5 adults!! It takes 4 minutes to go up, and 3 minutes to come back down. It is kind of like riding a Ferris wheel.
“And we will influence the curricula of the schools to become multicultural by means of revision of existing textbooks and educational materials.”
So pick all of these teams to win this weekend.
Western Conference Second Round: 8 Los Angeles Kings @ 2 St. Louis Blues, 6:30 pm/NBC Sports Network
We officially opened the doors to our new location at 1604 Queen St. West. The shop is bigger and better than ever baby!
He’s got a rod. This is a punishing rod. This is a weapon! He uses it to fight the Enemy. When he sees an enemy approach you he knows you’re not trained well enough to handle, he will beat it off. You won’t face anything greater than what you can handle. Anything that comes your way, you are a threat to it. But he also uses this rod on you. Because you will be tempted to rejoin the Enemy, and you will give in from time to time. You still have a sinful nature that betrays you at every turn. You have been rescued, it’s true. You are a saint. But this side of heaven, you are still also a sinner. And God’s not afraid to remind you that you still need him. He’ll use his rod to keep you in line. And when he does, it’s not to punish you. It’s to keep you alive.
Update: Wi-fi in this hotel crawls. So, sorry, but the commenting-on-other-writers-blogs will have to wait till Friday night, plane permitting.
A couple of years ago, as Keri and I were purchasing graduation cards we came across one with the silhouette of a graduating senior jumping in the air with his diploma in hand, and just below him the card read, “Thanks Wikipedia!”. This card led me to think of how much information we have at our fingertips today and how much of it we actually read or hear or watch in just one week. We receive information from Wikipedia, Facebook, Twitter, email, Pinterest, blogs, Youtube, the gazillion TV channels on cable, magazines, newspaers, the mail, our friends, families, acquaintances, and authority figures. With all the info we receive, we can’t possibly respond actively to all of it.
Maybe picnics such as I went to wouldn’t work today. But plan one like I’ve described here, and I’ll be there! Just don’t ask me at this point in my life to take part in the tug-of-war!
Avery Brewing Company Maharaja
At some point I have to stop white knuckling my autonomy and allow myself to rely on someone else for safety or the holding of secrets. Just not today.
I've always dreamed of a recessed storage nook... recessed + storage are two of my favorite things. So I convinced Brad to rip it out and see what was underneath.
Her talent is to apply the economic way of thinking to social issues like marriage, family and parenting.
One page is all it takes folks! If you can’t fit it in one page, you have most likely lost the interest of the reader. When in doubt, keep it simple. While constructing this document, it is ok to put everything you think you will need, and then edit it out later. Sometimes it is easier just to see it all together, and then you can start eliminating things that may seem redundant. One of the most common mistakes students make while writing out their résumé is lack of paying attention to detail. WATCH SPELLING; there is nothing more embarrassing when you have sent in
old TV shows
I'm sure that there still might be a way to pull it all together. Maybe I ought to try mixing B&W photos with color ones, or perhaps not having matching frames. I definitely think the floating shelves are not working. All this indecision has left many bullet holes on that poor, paneled wall. It's time to take a break from that. Until I figure it out, I decided to just keep it simple rather than awkwardly in transition.
Statistical Leaders (LL) (1 to 12)
In high school I thought I wanted to be an attorney, I wanted to put bad guys in jail. Dead set on it in fact. My first year in college I realized I didn't have the personality to be an attorney. I'm just not that type of person.
I struggle to see a viable business model behind this much publicized company that is about to jump on the current tech IPO bandwagon.
Reg. $7.50...Blitsy price $2.99
Among her new proposals is a suggestion that trained ‘licensed facilitators’ would need to be present when someone is at the point of ending their own life to ensure that lethal drugs are ‘taken correctly’.
I will deliver you, and you shall honor me.”
_____you know when you walk into a room and you forget why you went in there?? ok I just forgot where I was going with this joke
7) LCD Soundsystem- This Is Happening
The lack of sales is a bit ironic, because just last month at the Pasadena Antiquarian Book Fair I had my best sales at a book fair ever. Just as in Sacramento, I brought a variety of books — and in all price ranges from the one-figure to the five-figure. At the Pasadena fair, wrote invoices all weekend long. In addition to shopping for new material and the general bookseller merriment that occurs at book fairs, the high sales made it a great weekend.
He said nothing more and I watched him walk downward into the gloom, into the steep depths of the tower.
- a cup a day
Third Quarter: NBA
Meanwhile back in reality...
Skyline : outline of a group of buildings or mountains against the sky.
2.Now cover it with a wet cloth and keep it in warm place to rise up to double the original size.About 45 mins.
Later, we returned to our hostel, changed and got ready for the night, and went out. However, our timing was poor because the previous night, the football team from Bilbao, Athletic Club of Bilbao, had won a huge match and I guess the whole city erupted into a mad party. So Friday night came around and the entire city was dead. We wandered and went into a few places, but even the most crowded place was nothing more than a hallow bar with loud music. Eventually, we retreated and just went home.
39. Integration: You become emotionally, psychologically, physically, and spiritually stronger and clearer. You feel as if you are in alignment with your Higher Self.
Highlights include: “A Fool Such As I”, “Riot In Cell Block #9″, “Framed” and “Whadaya Want?”
Anyway, before I get into who WON, I want to remind you that in my giveaway post I mentioned that there would be a super fun project that could be made entirely out of the fat quarters I'm giving away (along with your chosen background fabric). Well, it's time to (sort of) reveal what that project is!
(N.B.: click on the images for an enlargement)
We have so much bad news and that is all we see if we watch the news today let’s try this. it’s going to be hard but we will pray together and try ok?
i took them back home because i thought i might need them one day
Alter the rebellion Chinamora and his family lived on Chishawasha Mission farm. * became a Christian with the name Kasper. The Government called all chiefs of
"Japanese whisky isn't necessarily lighter, but it possesses a clarity of aroma that singles it out. Its absence of a cereal background note also differentiates it from Scotch, as does the use of the intensely aromatic Japanese oak. If Scottish single malt is a rushing mountain burn, all the flavors jostling for position, Japanese malt is a limpid pool where all is revealed."
Once all of the ingredients are combined, turn the heat on low and allow the oatmeal to s-l-o-w-l-y heat, stirring often. Be patient. I've done this different ways, and I've found it's best to add everything to the cold pan, and then heat it together slowly. When I've rushed the heat, I ended up with a grainy texture and small pieces of cooked egg instead of the thick, smooth, custard-like consistency you want. Good Saturday Morning Oatmeal takes time!
Fletch slid a narrowed glare at Pipsqueak as the boy sidled up beside him. “Baking a fucking cake, Squeak. You?”
Whether that survival is made any more or less likely by responding on such a scale to the cynical provocations by Hamas is another matter, but that judgement is for Israelis to make at the ballot box, and not for us.
(His manly pride was wounded much more when we learned his bag was lost and he would have to wear fluorescent floral shorts and shirts, from the island’s only souvenir shop, all week.)
There is plenty of comedy, particularly for anyone who knows something about the films, actors and different factions in Bollywood. There are many sly digs at the industry’s predilection for nepotism, all tongue in cheek and very funny! SRK is not exempt from Farah’s sharp wit: as he arrives for a film shoot, one of the bystanders comments “I thought he’d be taller”. Kirron Kher is in fine form as Om’s ‘filmi’ mother, and she has some fabulous scenery chewing moments. Shreyas Talpade and SRK have some fun scenes together and really seemed to enjoy hamming it up as junior artistes.
We saw the show, which was good but I felt not as good as when I went in March. It felt a bit like he was calling it in. Still hilarious, in bits, but nothing original from the last time. But you can tell, from what he talks about, that he is an incredibly well read person, and I would have liked to have talked to him about some of the stuff he riffed on. Especially when he talks about religion.
If you have Netflix streaming, watch this movie!
I was doing great there for awhile, but then I had minor surgery, which appealed to the slug in me, then there was the free lance lull, which followed Spring Break, all of these thing led to the slack that is me right now. I don’t exactly have writers block, I have plenty of ideas and time and the tools to explore these, I’m just finding it hard to pull it together.
Joseph Applegate said the "logo is uninspired and anachronistic and somewhat poorly constructed," but acknowledged "it will sell like crazy. There's even something bold about going the nostalgic route with something that has little actual heritage."
In short, the result of Mr. Obama's $2 billion expenditure to oust Gadhafi is a regime that will be led by jihadists, controls vast oil reserves and has inherited a very substantial arsenal (although some of it - including reportedly as many as 20,000 surface-to-air missiles - has "gone missing"). This scarcely can be considered a victory for the United States and probably will prove a grave liability.
I’ve debated with myself about which side of this equation Mabry is on. For instance, when I see Lipchitz piece crying, I think of sculpture as laughing at people who genuinely believe in the embedded spirit in things, who believe that a water spot under a bridge in Chicago is the Virgin Mary or that a crucifix can bleed real blood. Mabry maybe suggesting that Lipchitz’s strenuous beliefs in modernist form and its ability to tap into the primitive power of other cultures was bound to have a short shelf life. Mabry’s piece laughs thus like an Onion article or a seconds long bit on the Simpsons about a cheese wedge that looks like Elvis. I don’t think that Mabry believes things are this simple, but history, belief, and sculptural symbols come across a hodgepodge of tectonic pieces that seems to talk past each other in this work. It comes across as a Dada form of laughter.
Cheese and salad sandwich with white bread
Yes, it's a tricky situation. I've been to bars where I found myself ordering a beer from an unmarked glass because I didn't want people to see me drinking "the non-client beer". I've gone to the supermarket and bought crap american cheese because I wanted my client to get more sales, when they dropped us, I switched instantly to another crap american cheese. I have bought many cars from X brand while pitching a shitload of other car accounts. What I'm saying is that you need to have a balance, you need to pitch in when you can, but don't surrender your choices to whatever clients your agency has.
Aunty Pol
The discovery of a new typological pattern in Holy Scripture, through which our hope for the apocalyptic deliverance of the Church of Christ is renewed and strengthened, must be based… on clear New Testament authority. God’s saving acts in Israel’s history must be applied by a New Testament writer to the future redemption of Christ’s people by clear literary allusions to the Old Testament and a clear analogy of theological structure with regard to Israel’s salvation history.[4]
We've only glimpsed the Alpha.
I had so much love and support on that day though. Like, 7-8 families from my new ward showed up.
The Challenge: Create a Get Well card or gift set for a friend, family member, or acquaintance. Be sure to incorporate a Cuttlebug embossing folder, kraft cardstock, and string somewhere on your project.
This next photo I'm sharing with you is not my most photogenic moment, but it shows the true joy and excitement I was feeling to finally start this race.
Well I couldn't!
I made good use of the transparency sheets, printing the stamps onto them to layer over the papers.
Wiping out lunch boxes (since they are non toxic)
Disadvantages
“So, did you move here with your parents?” I asked, pretending to browse through the open book in my hand.
Well, I don’t have much of a clue what my readers might find interesting, but here are 7 things….
Sometimes, we are all so close to something that we cant see another view or we just assume everyone sees it the way we do. Getting these answers can help you see from a number of different views and a number of different points that all can help you reach the widest audience possible.
Here is the space choices:
Could also serve with a light syrup, but we all thought it was delicious without!
Tun Mahathir Mohamad on his return from his annual holiday in Argentina made a call to UMNO members to make way for “winnable candidates” even if they are not members, to secure victory for UMNO in the coming General Election. It was a positive call but, I had my doubts whether it would be adhered to as party politics is about survival and the slippery ascent to power. Self-sacrifice is not a common trait among the contenders for power.
Truths about her hair:
For my testimony, I created a little book that is titled "Book of You"- which actually came from my title "Boy"...since the initials of Book of You is boy...I know, a little corny and most people would never catch that- but it works :). I made a list of what Wyatt is like at age 4 1/2- both the good and the bad!! I love my oldest child with all my heart...but he makes me fear what's to come with my younger two- it's been a TOUGH couple of years!! He's always seeking his independence and testing the limits at every opportunity!! But that is what they're supposed to do and I'm told 5 gets better...so we shall see!
Website Design Theme: Corporate
Secondly, Shu/Gai/Inori/Mana. The fight scene as it stands is so goddamn bland when it isn’t being outright terrible. So how do we make it interesting? One very simple change: make it so that Mana was never moved to a separate floor. She is trying to do her goddamn stupid dance and usher in the apocalypse whilst Shu and Gai fight around her. Do you realise how much of an awesome dynamic we’ve got now? Shu is now trying to interrupt Mana’s dance – possibly even kill her – to prevent what she’s doing. So naturally Gai is doing everything in his power to stop him doing that! Already this fight has gotten more tactical, more interesting, and less straightforward. But it gets better – Mana is in Inori’s body, isn’t she? So of course Shu is going to have difficulty directly attacking Mana, because he still sees Inori! He’s reluctant, and he has to find an alternative or get over it quickly in the heat of battle! Oh man, this is sounding so good – but wait, there’s more: what if Mana had a direct effect on the battle? What if she tried to play into Shu’s mind – distracting him, teasing and demoralising him, using magic to try and make him hallucinate, and what if she was able to divert some of her power into either trying to blast Shu or buff Gai? I think I just made the final fight actually interesting and exciting and dramatic. And all it really took was moving one character somewhere else and letting things play out with all the differing motives naturally. But of course, the choice they made resulted in an easier to write scenario, and we all know the writers are all about being lazy and terrible.
The following is the clarification/rebuttal that we have received from CSIR:
1/4 cup Cheese (Any variety)
Ribbon or twill tape (I used two metres and it fit 15 triangles, also make sure it's thick as it just makes it easier).
Plus .... I slept a little better when I knew the truth ...... I always worried one of those busy buggers would miss my place with all those kids to take care of ..... once I knew who was REALLY in charge ..... I knew I they would never let me down ..... no matter how hungover they would be in the morning.
My mother smiled at him. “Thanks again for everything. How can we possibly repay you?”
Appearance: deep gold, slightly hazy (probably from dry hopping) with a thick white persistent head.
Cheers WP Family!
At the same time he had a dogwood planted close to the house, just outside our den window. Little yellow flowers have appeared on its wispy baby branches. It will be gorgeous next summer.
"Who was he?" I asked, trying to keep my voice nonchalant.
Axelle Red Elle danse seule B
Speaking of validation, lovely Sharon Vander Meer has nominated the Mobyjoe Cafe for Liebster Blog Award. Sharon’s blog is all about writers and writing. It came on a day that sucked more than an Electrolux–at least that’s what I tweeted at the time, so the boost was much appreciated.
We Recommend Staying At,
If those channels do not work; in other words, if they do not result in poor journalism being corrected, well, to once again quote the Freedom of Expression Institute, all must have faith it "will come out in the wash".
Gas prices helped sales. The nationwide average for a gallon of gas jumped 19 cents in March, from $3.73 to $3.92, and it crossed the $4 mark in California even earlier.
This is where it helps to have an experienced therapist that knows you well. She usually responds by gently coaching,
In the United States, we have thousands upon thousands of laws and regulations that businesses must comply with. On the other side of the globe, there is often very little red tape.
Next, take a large piece of freezer paper and trace the outline of the poster board so you know exactly how much space you have to fill. Draw a pattern of your room - know the more detailed it is, the more work it will be! I didn't end up putting all of these little details in my kitchen, but the main components are important at this point.
-Guitar World Interview, Feb. 1991.
Who says, just because you are Vegan, that you cannot enjoy the recipes you like? You can enjoy those recipes, you just need to learn how to substitute items within the recipe!
And oh, that my Savior were your Savior too.
I slowed down and handed her the keys. I started to run in place.
LISTENING to the customer!!!!
Reverence for tradition was central to Toryism and to Disraeli's own personality. He wanted his new-style Tory party to embody respect for tradition--wanted it to be new and old, to be a modern setting for ancient gems, a new crown displaying old jewels. This was a popular idea in 19th-century Britain, where "the future" and "the past" were both discovered, simultaneously.... His underlying thought, which defined Disraeli-type Toryism and reshaped conservatism for all time, was that the Conservative party was the national party. Sounds simple and is. But everything else followed. If you understood "national" properly, then (on the one hand) the Tories must be a democratic, "universal," progressive party that cared about the poor and working classes--since the party was national it must care for the whole nation, for all classes. But the Tories must also be a patriotic party that revered ancient traditions and institutions, again inasmuch as they were the national --and therefore honored profoundly the nation's heritage and distinctive character. He put it like this:
Love is not afraid to cut the skin if it knows it will save the life.
So keep up the great work and keep those tips coming! They definitely help inspire me to organize areas of my home that I didn't even realize were a mess! (but ooh - it makes such a difference once I do!)
Dalrymple manages to explain all this, as far as I can recall, without once using the word “fundamentalist”. He lets his people tell their own stories.
The Ribbon on top of the box are strips of Purple Cardstock stamped with Dots and I curled.
It may not impress everyone, but it definitely won't hurt your pocket to get these. ;)
Pick anything against the former President Olusegun Okikiola Aremu Matthew Obasanjo, corruption or whatever, but I challenge you to list ten major security challenges heard of during his reign. Ten major ones. I am not oblivious of the Kaduna, Jos, Benue ethno-religious crisis, but I beg someone to remind me of any particular group or organization that came to the media to brag that they were responsible for so and so attacks.
The poem with no name,
Gaddafi's plan to link the price of oil to gold and to nationalise the Libyan oil industry made him a genuine threat, as did his efforts to unite Africa with a telecommunications program which would have saved the continent billions. It was a travesty to bomb the man made river in Libya, a project which was acclaimed as a masterpiece.
Frenchy: "Av you looked ze baz?"
So this year, I got a head start.
Jen :)
To round things out, we fried up some okra. We've always had success with our cornmeal coating, but Cranky, for some reason, followed a recipe. Pow-la Deeeeeeen! Y'all let us dah-yown! The batter didn't stick. At all. Ah well.
John made an expression of almost comic resignation and shrugged.
a network of local women’s and human rights organisations
Or the ordinary person, who in times of war and strife, goes off to serve this Country and offers up his life?
Agents are always looking for the Next Big Name lurking in their slush piles. They live in hope.
There will also be young adult novels by Nathan Wrann and a children’s book by Kimberly Dalton available. Wrann will have his first two books in the paranormal thriller Dark Matter Heart trilogy at the NEHW table. In Good Night Fright, Dalton rhyming children’s book, John is afraid to go to sleep so he asks his friends how they handle the monsters in the closet. She also illustrated the book.
- My husbands bosses wife (better known as Kim Possible one of my favorite cartoon characters) single handily made and coached me with a flower bed in front of the house, knowing I am a severely dysfunctional gardener.....
…but Tsugumi is able to get the info to Shu, who then asks Gai for orders (character development!) who then basically gets Shu to use Arisa’s void to protect the ship. You could make the case that it’s awfully convenient that Arisa had the right void to protect the ship, but given that Gai can see other’s voids, and given his comment earlier that Arisa reminds him of an Armadillo… yeah, that was pretty clever. Oh wait, surely he must have known the ship would get attacked?!? And no, he has not met Arisa before, nor knew she would be there. He had no other countermeasures in place. Goddamn it, Guilty Crown writers.
Here is a sample of one of the challenges.
I've had a life-changing experience as of late, and I want people to know about it.
Stardust Glalaxy Gelly Roll Pen - Yellow and Silver (on bag)
My high maintanance rep is feeling a bit bruised over this. I mean, it's so easy now!~ Just toss Target at me and watch me squeal!
Finally at the edge of London some 3 hours and a train-sandwich-dinner later another surprise… Fire alarm at King’s Cross! So we took a break in the darkness of the city, because after all we were in really no hurry to get home. …One hour later on the underground thinking that I may yet make it home I hear: This train is held at a red signal, please wait for further announcements…Wait we did, I wasn’t too keen on jogging home with suitcase and backpack in tow ;-)) Then there we go, miracle happens and we move again!! But miracles don’t last long, 2 more stops down the line: This train is held at a red signal… and you know the drill. The two other passengers in the wagon gave me the looks when I suddenly started giggling uncontrollably!
YAYYYYYYYYYYYYY....
Im going to start offering listings of my favorite styles of costume gowns to make! I dont know why I didnt do that before - probably so busy with all those Fluffie Rufflies!!!!!!
i've never sprayed an entire piece and i will admit that this bench is far from perfect.
Back in 2008, my dad and I were in attendance for an Orioles game at Camden Yards (the opponent was the Pittsburgh Pirates). He was looking at the scorecard and said someone in Mets history was a coach for the Orioles.
There are numerous suggestions for practicing Kegels, which include:
It is with great joy and gratitude to God that I welcome you to the Blog The Lighthouse.
I have been neglecting my writing here terribly. My visits to all of you, dear friends, have been in the last weeks sporadic at the very best, for which I very much apologize. I am running out of time - yes, that precious time I have left with the man I love endlessly, until our temporary but impending separation comes the month of May. My life is currently in the most profound and fulfilling state I can ever recall, thus my attention these days is directed elsewhere and is forcing me (in a welcomed way) to take an extended blog break.
Optionally, use citron vodka in place of unflavored vodka for a fruitier taste.
and am working on a paper now which examines the many facets of Franklin ave and the surrounding community. I will be sharing it with my professor and anyone else interested, but am not seeking any sort of publication and will respect the confidentiality of people who share their thoughts. If people would like to talk individually, I am open to
Town is crawling with soldiers and the Ministry for National Mobilisation is filled with uniformed and plain clothes investigators.
*Oh, yes, we know all about how the stork leaves the babies under cabbage leaves. (wink)
This has to be the quickest dessert you can make and it's not only really tasty but pretty healthy too. It's a brilliant one for kids because they can make it themselves. As long as you have a blender you're sorted. The choice of flavours is entirely up to you, I'm using mixed summer fruits and cherry yoghurt, it gives your finished dessert such a vibrant colour. Frozen mango and pineapple with coconut yoghurt are a fantastic combination too.
With apologies to Bob Dylan, the times they are a-changin’ for the Mets. Here are some examples to show just how much things have turned around for the orange and blue.
Death is at the last. In some sense it is the last of this mortal life; it is the last of our period of trial here below; it is the last of the day of grace; it is the last of the day of mortal sin. The tree falleth when we die, and it sprouteth not again; the house is washed from the foundations and it is built no more if it hath been founded on sin. Death is the end of this present life. And how certain is it to all of us!
Yep, it is that easy. I left mine for about an hour for the scent to really develop and then went a little crazy spraying all the pillows and sheets before making the beds, they all smell heavenly!
Photographers, or writers, need to have their very personalized vision and that's what you're selling.
*Brush Bag
Here is what I made for Cooking with Cricut #62 Challenge this week. This challenge you had to use Candles, Wreaths or Pine Cones. I used all them, cause soon as I seen what the challenge was this idea came to me. I love Pine Cones especially when they have a little bit of snow on them. They are so pretty.
In emptiness, what looks
Lucky, the buff Orpington hen, lived a very long time and laid many eggs for us, which we ate and enjoyed.
I have the entire shower curtain memorized. Really I do. But I really haven't looked closely at it until recently.
It's true.
Too bad Taggart forgot to mention that Hannah's also a Guardian of magical dragons called the Draecna. And as Hannah's sworn otherworldly protector, Taggart is honor-bound not to lay a hand on her, no matter how close he gets...
Finally got home and called the dr back - this time the lady took me seriously and put me on hold. I assume she spoke straight with the dr b/c she came back telling me to come right in.
The party was at the Community Hall which worked out perfect for all the kids to play (and maybe some adults joined the fun;)
However, considering these are such short stories, they can't account for the whole lost time. So, what else? Well, I've been moving house from Manchester to live with my gf in Southampton. A much bigger and more difficult experience than I had ever anticipated. However, I am now safely ensconsed and getting back to work, hence my return to this blog.
If you feel like you still want to join, please fill out the sign up form below. You will be contacted within approximately one week. (If the form does not work, you may email the information to catholicmothers (at) comcast (dot) net.)
And Darcy has a serious mullet! But i want to keep a lock from his first haircut the same as i did for Jordy so will wait til i get to town for that.
What others picked…
NOTE: I had some left over frosting and chocolate. I used the rest of the chocolate to make chocolate covered strawberries. The frosting- was used on graham crackers for the kids. I think this recipe calls for too much frosting and chocolate- but I always find a use for the leftovers.
That was just one of the many things awaiting repairs, even years after they landed. There had just been so much to do. Once all the survivors had been found, the dead properly buried, the various camps full of their people had to gather. Their leaders, spiritual and physical, had had a conference, in which it was determined it would be impossible for The Exodar to fly again, just as Brother Kalim had said. With the Night Elves, the first to make contact with them, offering them a place with their people and with like-minded people of the world who also had had unpleasant contact with the Burning Legion and would help them with their fight, it made sense to not try to run again. Azeroth would stand with them against their greatest threat.
Both of these techniques are problematic, especially when traveling by bicycle. First, it’s never advisable to travel with large amounts of cash. Three hundred dollars is a lot of money to keep in your backpack, the equivalent to a month’s salary in some South American countries. Theft is more likely when traveling with cash. Don’t ask me how, but thieves know when you’re concealing money in that super secret undergarment belt. Unnecessary stress is created because you constantly feel on-guard.
So here we are this morning. Wes thinks he'll be done with the floor by the end of today. We discussed the pattern I'd like him to lay....and he didn't even complain. I like those kind of professionals. :-)
P.S. She died from drowning, not from a drug overdose or a heart attack. There’s an article about it on CNN. Just look it up, will ya?!
Schlafly Taproom (2100 Locust St) Being St. Louis’s oldest brewpub, Schlafly has certainly lead the way for all other breweries that have come up after them. Set in an historic printing building, the Taproom is one of the most unique brewpubs in all of St. Louis. It also has, in my opinion, one of the best menus in town. This is a must visit.
Cool in the tin for 5 minutes then remove to a wire rack.
I know I don't usually read contemporary books, but I have a not-so-secret weakness for funny contemporary books, especially when they deal with Lite Issues like zits and dating and stuff. As soon as I saw the blurb, I knew I had to read Fetching. Plus, there's behaviorism (!), and for those who don't know, I'm a big fan of behaviorism.
Last week I updated you on legislation that would tweak Statute 177, the Unclaimed Property Statute. Today, I would like to update you on what’s been going on with these bills “under the dome”.
Order this very moment, at this very time,
“We work as a partnership with our authors.”
Above: Kam "Cupcake" Nelson, back in the day
As always, please link up and leave a comment so that I may selfishly enjoy the fruits of your labors! And thank you for your enthusiastic participation these last few weeks. It's been wonderful to watch you all take one form and shape it in so many varied ways.
My most consistent style signifier is a scarf or muffler, whether silver-shot ash gray ($38, Ann Taylor) or the four crinkled silk ones I bought years ago at Banana Republic (cream, brilliant pink, chocolate brown, ashes of roses.) I buy them long and wide enough that they also work as sashes or shawls. I have scarves of vintage Victorian paisley wool and embroidered silk and modern pieces like the looped circles of burgundy wool I bought from a Paris street vendor.
This book is written from the perspective of a journalist conducting interviews with people from all over the world who were involved in fighting off the zombie hoards. In trying to describe every eventuality and cover every facet of the war, Brooks sacrifices the possibility of riveting story arcs that could have made me care about the individual humans involved. There were a few stories that stood out (the blind old Japanese man in the wilderness, the female American pilot lost in Louisiana) but most of the rest of the reports blended together in a nameless, faceless swirl. Even when I knew a character was being revisited, it wasn't often that I remembered where their story left off. And, paradoxically, it was annoying when stories stopped at a cliffhanger and were never picked up again.
The record: Brimful of Asha, by Cornershop, 1997.
I have talked to several of my friends about giving an allowance to our children. Opinions vary widely on this subject, which was not something that I had anticipated. Some don't do allowance and don't plan to start. Others give allowance attached to doing chores. We give our son an allowance and also make him do chores without any compensation. I will not tell you that you should give your child an allowance. The decision to give or not give your child an allowance is as individual as you are. I am just giving suggestions for how to give an allowance in a constructive way.
"I was looking for the answer myself and do not own a laundromat myself but, my research shows that an average laundromat which would cost you roughly $150,000 makes a profit of between 25 and 40 thousand dollars annually. Of course you would have to subtract the payments on the loan that you take out to pay for it. But after the loan is paid, I think you can expect to make about 25 to 40 grand and you actually only have to do about 15 hours of work per week if you want it that way.
These subs were preparing for an invasion of the United States and were about to nuke military facilities in the Pacific Northwest: Fairchild Airforce Base in Washington state, Whidbey Island Naval Base, and the Evertt Naval Station. Other nukes were targeting Seattle and Portland.
Hello there! Are you excited by space? Are you super into spaceships and vast galatic empires? Are you mildly aroused by the concept of controlling a vast fleet of warships that travel the universe subjugating civilizations?
So, you’ve been sticking with it, you’ve been eating well, and you’ve been training lots. The icing is shrinking, all is going really well…
Occasionally, I would see little arms flailing around in the back seat. Toys were being tossed around, an occasional scream would erupt, and Mom would be trying to console little Johnny with a snack or some juice. There were some lone drivers. This group varied a bit. There were happy faces singing with the radio (I even saw one waving an imaginary microphone), some were talking to themselves, some smiling, and a few were wiping away tears. Occasionally there would be cars that were so loaded down with people that it was amazing to me that they were actually rolling down the road. There were girls out shopping, laughing and giggling all the way and the guys were out just trying to “play it cool”. I saw all kinds.
This is such a great way to start off 2012. I'm offering a class to create this double page layout and 3 more!! You will be making, New Years, Valentines, Spring and Birthday. What do you say, are you ready for this class?? This class is scheduled for Friday February 10th at 6 pm.
They published some photos given to them by a disgruntled ex-soldier from the 82nd Airborne that were taken in Afhanistan by American soldiers in combat over two years ago, showing our warriors posing with the corpses and mugging for the camera.
lighten the burden of those who work for you.
Anyways, now that I have taken you off on a tangent, I will try and get back to the story. The person that created this group is planning a pre-reunion party for our class. This is kind of funny, because although I didn't have many friends in high school, and very few in my grade, I really want to go. I was not popular, I would bet half of the people I have been talking to the last few days have no idea who I am.
She started a tradition of wearing red poppies to commemorate the Memorial Day. She sold poppies to friends and co-workers and donated the money to servicemen in need. The idea was picked up by a visiting Frenchwoman who took the tradition back home to France, where it spread throughout Europe. In fact, Europeans have managed to cling to that tradition far better than the Americans who started it.
Yet whatever ideas are put forward, one thorny question remains: How can something as immaterial as consciousness ever arise from something as unconscious as matter?
And though they've struggled against one another for power, they both share the critical common theme of a rejection of Monarchy.
England: Shit. Are you sure? Cuz last I checked, my cows don’t go to the polls.
but then again Gingrich is done for
Begin by adding a little olive oil to a heavy pan and sweat the onions and garlic on very low heat. When the onions are translucent remove them from the pan and place aside. Rinse the chicken livers and trim and discard any fatty tissue. Place livers in a dish and dredge with flour to coat both sides.
Like a gift dropped into my lap an idea came to me. It partly came from a conversation I had with my massage therapist who was pushing a doctor friend who is 42 and single into my preview. I politely declined her invitation to mention my name. I’m not ready for that. But she told me how he had spent his early career on the mission field and now realized he was lonely and wanted a family. I emphasized to her that I was definitely not her gal then. Been there done that.
Lots of things aren't going as well as they might. You encounter obstacles wherever you look. Try to deal these apparently adverse conditions in a laid back manner and see them as a challenge. If something isn't going the way you planned it can still have positive outcomes and all the obstacles on the way just serve to make the journey more interesting.
Here I think we get to the basic ethical problem that flat ontology opens and the question of what a flat ethics might look like. I’m of the mind that even within an object-oriented ontology, ethics must nonetheless be the domain of the relational or, as Morton might put it, the ecological. However, this relational domain of the ethical must be a strange kind of relation, insofar as it must be a relation to the non-relational and a non-relation to the relational. In other words, the ground of the ethical would be that moment where relations to the non-relational are no longer governed by the similar/dissimilar schema, but where the contingency of ones own system/environment comes to be recognized and perception of a plurality of system/environment distinctions inhabiting the environment of a system comes to be discerned. In this respect, flat ontology would recommend something similar to the ethics of difference Lacan suggests at the end of The Four Fundamental Concepts of Psychoanalysis. As Lacan writes there,
but because of who we got to go see santa with.
Unfortunately, wishes always take ”were”s. When making a statement that is not factual, the verb is in the subjunctive mood, and the subjuctive of verb “to be” is “were” in the past tense, regardless of what the subject is.
Emmett is having a hard time keeping his guilt a secret. After Bay, regarding his being a zombie for the film, jokes about possibly looking dumb for not figuring it out, he goes to collect himself. Melody, who became super-mom this week and admitted her err in judgment about Bay, finds him. He initially snaps at her, but apologizes. Without saying who, he admits to his mom that he made a mistake with another girl and he’s upset that he’s ruined everything with Bay. Melody, pretty calmly, tells him he has to live with it, but wonders if Bay really has to. As someone who was probably cheated on, she’s coming for her heart, wondering if telling Bay will actually help anything.
EFS now offers web-based Terminal Disclaimer: The PTO has made a small but very useful improvement to e-filing. Instead of uploading a Terminal Disclaimer in the form of a PDF, you can now fill out a web-based Terminal Disclaimer form. See the PTO announcement here and more details here. The TD is automatically processed to verify that the filer is listed on the power of attorney, and if so the TD is automatically approved. In contrast, filing the old way requires a manual review of the TD by PTO personnel. One caveat: if you're not on the power of attorney, the assignee must sign, in which case you'll probably want to file the old way.
It took me a while to notice the little icon in the bottom of the page mentioning I was updating this blog, instead of my Cantanopy Photography blog. And since with every post an email is being sent out, all my faithful followers received some photos as updates in the wrong blog.
Before Steve could reply, Brian chorused, “Steve, have you had a run-in with anything that kept you away forever?” In answer, Steve jested, “Uh, let me put it this way, when…on Capitol Hill…they’ve been talking about the Buffett Rule, I thought they were talking about the Jimmy Buffet Rule which means less than four margaritas probably a good idea.”
To the place where I cleared my head of you;
We cut back to Batman's giant flying Bat-plane where Batman has taken the descriptions given by Jonah, fed them into his computer and realizes that these guys work for the Combine. Hex asks about Stiletta but Batman says he has no idea. He explains that these two guys that have conned Jonah run the Kit Kat Klub on the old West side.
“lonely–i am so lonely…*
"OH NO they pulled Ruby's braids!!!"
June 30: The FDA warned that the antidepressant Cymbalta could increase suicidal thinking or behavior in pediatric patients taking it. It also warned about the potential increased risk of suicidal behavior in adults taking antidepressants.
2 ½ cup Dry Rajma (Kidney Beans)
Red Bull produced and marketed an energizing drink under the world famous trade mark RED BULL. It obtained numerous international registrations for that trade mark, valid, inter alia, in the Benelux countries. Winters, a Dutch Company, was an undertaking which was mainly involved with the filling of cans with drinks produced by itself or by others. Smart Drinks Limited, a legal person under the law of the British Virgin Islands, was a competitor of Red Bull.
Confirmation #6: Cincinnati Ohio , Central Indiana heading ENE towards Cleveland OH Tornado watches issued by the NWS .. hail and damaging winds as well as tornado WARNINGS issued by the NWS: also Hail at the border of KY, and WV :
on my local NPR station in which I did some rapid blather about taxes and pyramids and diamonds and oligarchy and historical perspective. Stuff you’ve all heard from me before, but redolent and relevant this year.
I have not always been in this position (as is obvious by the fact that this is a start up operation). My previous position involved spending 13 years in the legal profession specialising in Employment Law. In saying this however, I have always had an entrepreneurial streak. I spent 10 years in my own legal consultancy/firm which I started from scratch at some considerable risk.
Wiles showered, declined the standard prison-issue breakfast and began cell-front visits at around 7 a.m., including saying the rosary with his spiritual adviser.
Saw these stamps on my blog rounds, at first I thought I'd not use them but when I saw them I loved them lol, they are of course by Magnolia and are from the latest stamp club so don't know their names yet,
Full Bio. Source Wikipedia, YouTube and imdb.com
Till the next time – have fun and enjoy life, I will certainly be trying to that without any withdrawals!!!
My first thought was "no way." We can't afford a new camera. Apparently it was a floor model that was being sold off so Rich got it at an incredible discount.
I have an apology. I love getting samples. I love sharing samples with friends. I then have a bad habit of taking a while to actually write about the samples.
These burgers are really colorful and a great conversation starter in any room in the house.
APRIL 24 - 28
Santa Himself!
Also, HFA grants some flexibility regarding the size of the affordable units. Though the agency requires that 20% of the units be affordable, it requires that only 18% of the floor area be devoted to those units, thus allowing for somewhat smaller units. For 80 DeKalb, FCR plans to devote 18.6% of the floor area to affordable units, according to documents submitted to HFA.
You’re a personal exercise trainer?
She has cut all of her molar teeth (painful for all of us) and she's working on 3 of her canine teeth right now (not AS painful, but we have definitely had some bad days)! When she's not cutting teeth, she is the sweetest, happiest little girl you'll ever meet. Also, when she's not cutting teeth, she ADORES Hannah!! I mean seriously adores her!!! She follows her around everywhere, does everything Hannah does and says everything Hannah says. They play so well together! Alice Anne also loves Hannah friends!! She gets so excited to see them and she truly thinks she is just as big as they are!
My 17-year companion, Schrodinger the cat, died last night. We all knew this day would come - 17 years is a long life for a cat - but it still hurts to say goodbye.
Last night I made quesedillas with cilantro pesto.
sweet elements, and this is what
The identity tags that enforcement officers are required to wear will typically be hidden by a jacket during these instances, and migrants who have asked for the names/IDs of the officers are then subjected to various forms of violence. As a consequence, evidence collecting is impossible as migrants are unable to identify these specific officers.
2. Adrianne (winner)
We also brought out a tunnel that has been in Ryan's closet for a while and I tried to train them in agility, no...I'm kidding. Even better, Ryan dragged Haylee around the yard in it and nearly killed her which really made me laugh and take videos.
Is it fair that we love Rooney Mara so much for her role as Lizbeth Salander in “The Girl with the Dragon Tattoo” and don’t love Kate Mara because of her role as Hayden McClaine in “American Horror Story”? No, but there you have it. We’ll set that aside, however, to talk about Kate’s eyebrows, because like Rooney, she has good ones. In fact, Kate’s Oscars makeup was quite pretty and delicate, like her vintage-feeling lavender gown, and complemented her dark eyes and auburn hair. Her brows were spot-on, dark without being overpowering or too much of a contrast with her haircolor. Because she’s obviously a natural brunette, her brows darkness and density only require grooming, and perhaps fixing.
Third, the hypocrisy: There is no contradiction between the DA's position on either the Media Appeals Tribunal or the Protection of Information Bill and its decision to remove Majavu from its mailing lists. The state should not vet the work of journalists nor should it hide information from public scrutiny.
On the morning of the second day, an interesting phenomena began to occur. There were unusual characters popping up all over the place... people in costumes of some sort. I distractedly assumed that they were there for some sort of childhood related performance or something. It was cute how they were posing for photos in the trees, whatev.
If it doesn’t mean that the church was in heaven then why are they pictured as coming down from heaven after the judgment day in chapter 20?
Preheat your oven to 350° F (180° C), butter and flour the pan and keep it aside. Beat the eggs and sugar until it becomes thick. Then slowly add in the oil.
Me: So we have more room for more empty boxes?
With this spring cold winding down I thought it would be nice to get a post put up. After sitting at my desk staring at the computer screen, I decided a bit of inspiration was needed. Grabbing my camera I headed outside to see what would catch my eye.
The first breath of a babe
Al stared out the window at a line of cars. They stood stock-still during evening rush hour, along Spring and High Streets. Dummies in Gridlock.
Pops was thrilled at this idea. "We take so many pills anyway, what's one more," he said. He was going to rush out the next day and ask the pharmacist all about fish oil and Omega-3s.
I'll have to tell you sometime how I almost caught our last house on fire.....
Now over to New Agers. Pretty much the same thing with us. We believe in angels and saints. We believe that a Saint from any religion can help us because they have reached a level of enlightenment much higher than the average person at present and will not care about such petty things as what name you attribute to God. If you call on them they will come, be you Catholic, Protestant, Buddhist, agnostic or New Ager. It doesn’t matter, you called for help they will come and do what they can (understand however it’s more of a whispering in your ear to see the opportunities to earn what you want or to get out of the situation you want to get out of, or at least to calm or strengthen you as the situation and request may call for). (More along the lines of what you saw in the movie City of Angels than in It’s A Wonderful Life).
Wynkoop Railyard Ale: An elegant, mahogany-colored beer with a creamy tan head, aromas of biscuit malts and sliced apples or pears, and flavors of toasted malts and caramel. It is 5.3 % ABV. In age of increasingly “extreme” beer, Rail Yard is an extremely pleasing session beer for discerning beer lovers
If you can force yourself to face the impending burden
ADDIS ABABA. Libya's Muammar Gadaffi has been elected head of the African Union and has vowed to create a single unified political entity called "Libya", stretching from Tripoli on the Nile to Tripoli at the Cape. Amid rapturous applause from AU heads of state, Gadaffi was handed his ceremonial flywhisk and aviator sunglasses, both symbols of African power.
We must examine Darwin’s intention here very carefully. As we know, Darwinism explains the origin of life with two unconscious natural mechanisms: natural selection and random changes (in other words, mutations). According to Darwinist theory, these two mechanisms led to the emergence of the complex structure of living cells, as well as the anatomical systems of complex living things, such as eyes, ears, wings, lungs, bat sonar and millions of other complex system designs.
A curse
I will not be able to answer your comments; I have also insisted that Gemini Girl takes a break, and caters to her husband and her kids as I do not want her pretty blue-eyed hubby to knock at my door, all sad and shit… While we’re on the topic, Gemini Girl Hubby, you owe your wife 2 back rubs, one fantastic night out – whatever she wants – and please frame a picture of Le Clown to be placed in your foyer. All by Friday, please. Gemini Girl, I am publicly giving you some love, and can’t thank you enough for having raised the bar for all future personal assistants… You’re a good friend – yes, I used “friend” in front of everyone and I am NOT taking it back.
I prepped these the night before, so I could just put them in the oven when I got in. I layered them with baking paper, and kept them in the fridge in a sealed box. They went a bit soggy, but peeled away from the baking paper layers just fine, and cooked (as per the instructions) to perfection.
So remember whatever adversity you’re facing, many of the people you admire today have struggled too. We didn’t all have it easy. We weren’t all born with a silver spoon in our mouths. We didn’t all hit it big by 30.
had a mother. This isn't just about being a mother; it's about appreciating
Once again, I have to say it felt so good to create something! I have been wanting to make a book sculpture similar to this for 2 years now - I finally did it! This book is really solid, you can not close this book or even turn a page!
The Marquis of Granby is probably the pick of the pubs at Cambridge Circus, unfortunately that isn’t saying a great deal!
6: Ang taong nagigipit…
The Carpathia, waiting for a little more light, was slowly coming up on the boats and was picking them up. With the dawn breaking, we could see them being hoisted from the water. For us, afraid we might overturn any minute, the suspense was terrible.
An Independent Review Panel has just reported and noted the problems with enforcing the law and calling for the Government to take steps. It now has the justification to strengthen the law. The Panel even suggested the Government could cite the precautionary principle to do so.
So what is context? Context is when you surround and connect the unfamiliar with familiar touch points, thus enabling the user to better understand. It’s providing a frame of reference, like the frame of a picture that adds to the enjoyment and understanding of the painting. It’s the difference between seeing Jeff Smith’s LinkedIn professional headline and seeing in his profile that he went to the same high school you went to and graduated when you did — chances are he’s your old buddy!
Again during the occupation of the Wisconsin Capitol last winter many of these same forces came together around the April 4th 2011 ILWU 10 port shut down in solidarity with public workers. These actions exemplified for many, the role labor could and should be playing in organizing actions to defend the most oppressed communities and the interests of the entire working class.
Saucony is an award-winning premium running shoes manufacturer that was founded in Pennsylvania. They’ve been manufacturing high-quality running shoes for over 100 years! Saucony uses the modern technology to improve the performance of their running shoes and performance footwear. Saucony has a respectable reputation when it comes to providing the best running shoes and they keep on winning the respect of the athletes all over the world.
Fate, schmate.
Per the article, it’s all speculation — meaning, this may entirely not be the case. But the idea is an intriguing one, isn’t it? That a publisher may have pulled their backing for the mere possibility of a studio saying “Screw it, we don’t need you guys”? Gets you a little fired up inside, doesn’t it?
Still, I am not that much of a scrooge, and I will use any excuse not to cook dinner. So, my gift to my kids this year was take-out pizza for dinner, followed by a homemade cake covered in jelly beans. I made chocolate-covered strawberries for Sophie's class and accepted my hero status with grace.
Buckinghamshire housewife Mrs Bledwina Blighty has been arrested in the Peak District on suspicion of the attempted murder of her husband.
- I, somewhat absurdly, want to knit a running sweater and earband. They will not be matching – the earband I see done in Fair Isle, while the sweater is just a stockinette wool thing (in grey?). I am envisioning extra-extra long sleeves on the sweater – almost like those onesies for babies with the foldover mitts on the sleeves. My fingers get cold running outside, but I hate wearing gloves or mittens.
Guess what!? You know the cute onesies and pants I wrote about from H&M that I couldn’t find in newborn size? Well, I did finally find them in newborn size and I also found matching hats and socks! First time I saw this set I knew it was the perfect take home outfit for baby, I just fell inlove!
However, both Gaylor and Barker had plenty to say that most certainly fell under the umbrella of “trashing religion.”
'If you saw a letter on the ground with an address and a stamp on it, what would you do?'
Between 1948 and 1967 about 850,000 Jews were expelled or forced out of Arab nations, and became refugees. Their assets were confiscated, their bank accounts frozen, and property worth millions of dollars nationalised. Jews were barred from government ministries, their entry in to the civil service was severely restricted, and many lost their means of livelihood. About 600,000 of these refugees went to Israel where the struggling newly-born State integrated them into the country and saw to their rehabilitation. The rest went to the Americas,Australia and Europe.
Her face radiant after the pain
When I came close
March 26 - Geraldine Ferraro, U.S. vice-presidential nominee (D, 1984), 75
‘Sounds charming,’ said Ray, getting up. ‘I’m going to check out the dips.’
I started out with this, on Friday afternoon:
Over the years most of my roles have been based in large open plan offices where I sit in amongst dozens of other colleagues, all working away at a common cause… well presumably! As an Executive Assistant I’ve always found it tricky working in an open plan environment for a number of reasons but mainly because of the amount of time I have to spend hiding the confidential documents I am working with while being interrupted yet again by a colleague asking for something! I now work in a secluded corner of my office where I have my own space and rarely have to worry about anyone seeing my work or sneaking up behind me, which is great. However I do miss the connection with my colleagues and the banter that can make your day fly by, which does seem to make me some sort of office plan Goldilocks – I want a desk space that is just right!
even by those we no not respect
This asymmetrical vest was a recent Goodwill purchase, I was thrilled to find. And this is a TOTAL Goodwill outfit! (except jewelry)
9) Sitting next to crazy people (see Sept 16th's post)
Tomatoes come in several generalized forms. The cherry tomato is good for salads and tends to be easier to grow than the larger tomatoes. I recommend Sun Gold which is a hybrid gold tomato. It is particularly good for our area as it is cold tolerant. It is early. Typically it is the first tomato in my garden to get ripe and the last one in the fall to still be standing. It is very disease tolerant, not because it has innate resistance, but because it grows so fast it seem to out grow a lot of the standard diseases. The best part about this little gem though is its taste. It frequently wins taste tests. Another favorite of mine is Black Cherry and Chocolate Cherry. They are two black tomatoes - well they are really brown with red and green hints, but they are called black tomatoes. Black tomatoes have a flavor all their own. If you have never tried one before, you are missing out.
However, any possibility that the French authorities could interview the prime minister of a sovereign state concerning bribery allegations is extremely slim – although the question could complicate any of Najib’s future plans to vacation in Europe.
So, I've been trying to take it easy and give my eyes a break from the computer screen but it hasn't been easy. I've been going through some of the picture books again and love Liz Rosenberg and Julie Downing's Nobody. http://search.barnesandnoble.com/Nobody/Liz-Rosenberg/e/9781596431201/?itm=1&USRI=nobody+rosenberg I'm sure those of you who are parents had a Nobody living in your house who enticed your kids to do the things they wouldn't do on their own. This is the case with young George whose imaginary friend, Nobody, loves to get into mischief as they do early one morning before the parents are up. Downing's grayish version of Nobody is delightful in a spotted footed sleeper and corkscrew-like curls. What expression she can add with just a few lines. And George - freckle faced, with hair standing on end. George and Nobody decide to make omelets. "It was a lot of work. Nobody called out words of encouragement. Nobody mopped up the first few mistakes. Then George sat and waited because he wasn't allowed to turn on the stove when Nobody was around." Two shocked parents arrive in the kitchen in their bathrobes to find the kitchen in shambles. "George, what were you thinking?" But, it isn't going to end in a scolding as mom sees George's face and gives him a squeeze and says, "I was really in the mood for pancakes. Do you think you could help me make some?" "But, of course," answered George. "Pancakes are my specialty." I wish I had this book when my kids were little as their invisible mischief maker was named "Not Me!"
Here my alternatives:
I have been doing some painting, some gardening, some sewing, some reading and lots of photography; a bit of an attention span problem, but no doubt I'll settle down. I finished the water colour below of Witch Hazel.
Sewing up a storm,
Thankyou so much to all you kind hearted folk who have joined me on my rambling journey, it's been so nice to meet all you all, there really are so many fabulously talented and inspiring folk out there. Its a strange virtual world but I am really enjoying meeting new friends and your comments motivate me to keep making and doing.
The subject line said “Very Urgent”.
“Because we needed Dianne to demonstrate it,” she said.
I am running for The Lymphoma Association which provides help and support for those who are diagnosed with the disease, and their families. If you would like to sponsor me you can visit my page here.
By default, the slider must be changed manually by the visitor by clicking the “dots” over the right top section of the slider. In theory, this is preferred in order to meet some government laws for accessible websites where nothing should move, jump, shake, rattle, or roll without the action being initiated by the user. Regardless of the access laws, most people want the slider to advance automatically.
I’d give anything to meet: Madonna
What I learned: Don’t blow your best scene on the first act. A lot of writers – especially young writers – make the mistake of putting their best scene in the first act. The problem with this is that every other big scene afterwards will feel like a letdown in comparison. If you’re going to put a great scene in the first act, then you have to be willing to top it again and again throughout your script. That was an issue I had here. The scene I remember most is the convenience store scene. And it happens inside the first 15 pages. You’re now going to have me sit around for another 100 pages and not read a better scene? I’m gonna feel let down. So when you get to those big scenes in your script, always try to top yourself from the previous big scene. You want your best most powerful stuff happening in the last third of the script if possible.
League Of Nations
Today I suspect she is watching Chelsea on the telly or at the Bridge. Football comes before everything. We have little in common and I'm sure she will be the first to admit that she is not at all maternal. She found the whole having 3 children a bit of drudge whereas I find it a joy. I think it makes me a better mother in any event - so I can thank her for that!
In Japanese Girl Make Up, players help a modern pretty young woman, Akiko, in preparation for a traditional party. Players are given an array of colors of lip-glosses for her pout, eye-shadows for the eyes and even colored contacts. Players are also given seven different options for eye liner/mascara, ranging from modest light liner to dramatic lashed that give the impression of false eye lashes. Along with makeup, players can also change the hairstyle, add earrings, traditional-styled headpieces and stickers which can be placed anywhere on her face or clothing.
1 pour
I get comments all the time about how much sport must be played in our house. There are also the inevitable comments about the untamed physical energy. And the noise............people assume that our house is sooooo noisy.
So I should change what I normally do.
Motherhood washed me
